CHAPTER 3
SENTIAL QUESTIONS
• How do new ideas change the way people live? Vhy rfo people trade? • What are the consequences when cultures interact? =’\. *
** v V \	t \
Lesson 1
A
Changing World Lesson 2
Early Exploration
Lesson 3
Spain in America
Lesson 4
Competing for Colonies








The Story
Matters. ..
The year is 1492—a good year for Queen Isabella. After centuries of struggle, Catholic forces have driven the Muslims from Spain. She is grateful to God—and determined to use her power for God's glory.
Full of these thoughts, Isabella recalls a visit she received from a sailor named Christopher Columbus. He proposed finding a trade route to Asia by sailing west. She ignored him then. Now she decides to fund his voyage. She knows if Columbus succeeds, it will bring glory to God—and untold wealth to Spain. The European exploration ofthe Americas is about to begin.
Queen Isabella
explorations ofthe America^'
The Art Archive / General Archive of the Indies ^||^| 1 i £& t*
Gianni Daqli Orti	«R" *	'	'	' ' lift
.. \jafc, a** & ■ A$j|k®

I
Goto the Foldables® library in the back ofyour book to make a Foldable® that will help you take notes while reading this chapter.
CHAPTER 3
Place and Time: The Americas i400 toi625
Starting in the late 1400s, Europeans explored the oceans, hoping to find a direct sea route to the East Indies. Instead, they found what to them was a "New World." Over the next few centuries, they explored and settled the Americas.
6()°N s
European Exploration 1487—1611
Hudson
Bay
NORTH
AMERICA
Step Into the Place
MAP FOCUS
This map shows the different routes taken by different explorers. MOVEMENT
How many European nations made explorations of North and South America? CRITICALTHINKING
Drawing Conclusions Why do you think so many nations sent out voyages of exploration at this time?
2A;29B
TROPIC OF CANCEL
v\
I K
I \ I I
NEW
SPAIN
PACIFIC OCEAN
fpf R	/ O i'H ' ,1’i J
2000 miles
Greenlar
Cuba
PERU
SOUTH AMERICA
«»
«»
I*
lr
h
N
W^-E
s
*

\ *






'—

I 1

0
X*' 5M':
0	2000 km
Miller projection

netw orks eT MAP Explore the interactive version of
There's More Online!	this map on
NETWORKS.
TIME LINE
Explore the interactive version ofthis time line on NETWORKS. 
30° E
60°E
90°E
12O‘-'E
150r’E
networks
There's More Online!
GRAPHIC ORGANIZER
Technological Advances
Ef maps
. Trade Routes to Asia . West African Trading Kingdoms
ef self-check quiz
Ef slideshows
• The Compass
. ‘MansaMusa
Ef video
'1m
Lesson 1
A
Changing World 


ENTIAL QUESTION
How do new ideas change the way people live? 
T£KS
Texas Essential Knowledge and Skills 2A Identify reasons for European exploration and colonization of North America.
Reading HELPDESK
It Matters because
Europe was aware of the riches of Asia and Africa. Attempts to increase trade with these lands eventually developed into an era of European exploration that reached far beyond Europe's borders.
New Ideas, New Nations
GUIDING question Where did the Renaissance take place?
For centuries after the Roman Empire fell in a.d. 476, the people of Western Europe were cut off from the rest of the work!. Western Europe was made up of small kingdoms and city-states dominated by the Catholic Church. Then, in the early a.d. 6()()s, a new religion, Islam, began to spread rapidly in the Middle East and Africa. This rise of Islam would soon end Western Europe’s isolation.
In 1095 the Europeans launched the first of nine expeditions, known as the Crusades. Their purpose was to take hack control of Christian holy sites in the Middle East from the Muslims-followers of Islam. The Crusades also had an unplanned result. In the Middle East, Europeans met Arab merchants, who sold them spices, sugar, silk, and other goods from China and India. European interest in Asia grew.
That interest grew even more after Italian explorer Marco Polo returned from China. In the late 1200s, Polo wrote about Asias people, great riches, and splendid cities in his book, Truvcls which was widely read in Europe. Two hundred years later, his Travels would inspire another Italian explorer-Christopher Columbus.
............................
Taking Notes: Identifying
As you read, use a diagram like this one to identify the advances in technology that paved the way for European voyages of exploration. 78 Exploring the Americas
TechnologicaTx
Advances-^
"IP
Content Vocabulary
•	Crusade . technology • pilgriiMS* *
•	classical • astrolabe • mosque
•	Renaissance • compass
GEOGRAPHY CONNECTION
The Growth of Trade
Merchants in Europe knew they could make a lot of money selling goods from Asia. Wealthy Europeans were eager to buy Asian spices, perfumes, silks, and precious stones.
Merchants first bought these goods from Arab traders in the Middle East. The merchants then sent the goods overland by caravan to the Mediterranean Sea. From there, the goods traveled by ship to Italian ports in Venice, Genoa, and Pisa. These cities prospered as centers of the growing trade. However, Arab traders charged high prices. This led Europeans to look for a route to the East that would not require them to buy from Arab merchants. The Growth of Ideas
By the 1300s, several Italian city-states had become strong economic and cultural centers. Their influence spread across Europe. Newly powerful bankers and merchants in Pisa, Venice, and Genoa studied classical works—those of ancient Greece and Rome.
Science was another area in which change occurred. Many scholars tested new and old theories of science. They performed experiments and evaluated the results.
Caravans, or groups of travelers, from Asia carried silks and spices overland to markets in the West. At the shores ofthe Mediterranean and Black Seas, the goods were loaded onto ships and transported to Europe.
LOCATION
How would you describe the location of Genoa and Venice? CRITICAL THINKING
Drawing Conclusions Based on the information on this map, why do you think European traders charged high prices for silks and spices?

Crusade one of a series of expeditions Europeans made to regain control of Christian holy sites in the Middle East from the a.d. 1000s to the 1200s classical related to the culture of ancient Greece and Rome
Reading in the Content Area: Understanding Visuals
When a map shows a historical event or era, you will not always find present-day boundaries. Sometimes you can identify where things are taking place today by using natural features, such as bodies of water. Historical maps provide a sense of time and help us to understand which cities and countries existed hundreds of years ago and which still exist today.
Lesson 1	79
r
The arts were also influenced by classical forms and new ideas. Authors wrote about the individual s place in the universe. Artists studied classical sculpture and architecture. They admired the harmony and balance in Greek art.
The Renaissance
This period of intellectual and artistic creativity is known as the Renaissance (reh.nuh.SAHNS). The word renaissance means “rebirth” in French. It refers to the rebirth of interest in classical Greek and Roman ideas. As the Renaissance spread across Europe over the next two centuries, it changed the way Europeans thought about themselves and the world. It also set the stage for an age of exploration and discovery.
The Mona Lisa, painted by Leonardo da Vinci, is a masterpiece of the Renaissance. From what we know, the portrait features a woman from Florence who was 24 years old when da Vinci began the painting.
Reading HELPDESK
The Rise of Powerful Nations
For centuries, Europe had been a patchwork of small states. By the 1400s, however, a new, larger type of state had developed in Western Europe. Strong monarchs rose to power in Spain,
Portugal, England, and France. They began to establish national laws, courts, taxes, and armies to replace those of the local rulers. These ambitious monarchs sought ways to increase trade and make their countries even stronger and wealthier.
As early as the mid-1400s, powerful countries such as Portugal and Spain began to search for sea routes to Asia. They, too, wanted to engage in foreign trade. This placed them in direct competition with the Italian port cities that had become so powerful a century earlier. As a result, a new era of exploration began.
READING PROGRESS CHECK
Drawing Conclusions In what way did trade help to bring about the Renaissance?
The Effects of New Technology
guidingquestion What technological advancements paved the way for European voyages of exploration?

Advances in technology—the use of scientific knowledge for practical purposes helped to make European voyages of exploration possible. In the 1450s, the introduction of the printing press made it much easier to print books. More people had access to books and to new information. Many Europeans read Marco
Renaissance a reawakening of culture and intellectual curiosity in Europe from the 1300s to the 1600s technology the use of scientific knowledge for practical purposes
astrolabe an instrument used to plan a course of travel using the stars compass an instrument that shows the direction of magnetic north
Academic Vocabulary
acquire to get possession
or control of
80
Exploring the Americas

Compass
Astrolabe
AIDS TO NAVIGATION
Quadrant
The compass helped sailors tell which direction they were sailing. The astrolabe and quadrant (QWAH • druhnt) measured the angle of a star to the horizon to help them find their location on the sea.
DRAWING CONCLUSIONS
Explain how the compass, astrolabe, and quadrant could make a long ocean voyage possible.
CRITICAL THINKING
Making Connections What tools might sailors use to find their position at sea today?
Polo’s Travels when it appeared in printed form in 1477. This book gave people descriptions of faraway places, such as areas that are now Iraq, Siberia, Japan, India, Ethiopia, and Madagascar. Whether the descriptions were entirely accurate is open to debate. However, Polo’s Travels led European readers to realize that there were many spectacular sights beyond their immediate world. Better Maps and Instruments
Most early maps were not accurate. This was because they were drawn based on the points of view of traders and travelers.
Little by little, cartographers, or mapmakers, improved their accuracy. Using reports of explorers and information from Arab and Chinese scholars and astronomers, mapmakers made more accurate land and sea maps. These maps showed the directions of ocean currents. They also showed lines of latitude, which measured distances north and south of the Equator.
People also improved instruments for navigating the seas. Sailors could find their latitude with an astrolabe (AS»truh»layb), which measured the positions of stars. In the 1200s, Europeans acquired the magnetic compass from China. The compass allowed sailors to accurately determine their direction.
Better Ship Design
Advances in ship design allowed sailors to make long ocean voyages. The stern rudder and triangular sail enabled ships to sail into the wind. The Portuguese three-masted caravel (KER«uh»vehl) became the most famous ship of the European age of exploration. Caravels could sail faster and carry more cargo and supplies than earlier ships. These advances and competition for
I foreign trade led countries such as Portugal and Spain to search | for sea routes to Asia. Portugal began its explorations along the | west coast of Africa, an area Europeans had never visited before.
D READING PROGRESS CHECK
3S----------------------------------
Identifying Cause and Effect How did the caravel affect exploration in a 5 s positive way?
Lesson 1	81
GEOGRAPHY CONNECTION
Trade routes across Earth's largest desert the Sahara, provided West African kingdoms with access to the Mediterranean coast.
LOCATION
Which West African kingdom extended the farthest west? CRITICAL THINKING
Drawing Conclusions Other than the information on trade routes, what key historic information does the map show?
ATLANTIC OCEAN
Marrake* TROPIC OF CANCER
i} i	V| /
/■si:
2O°N
Tomboudou ✓
/Timbuktu)
n0 EQUATOR 0	600 km	.	.	/
J
Lambert Azimuthal Equal-Area projection^ West African Trading Kingdoms a.d.400-1600

1
Kingdoms and Empires in Africa
guiding question What were the most powerful empires in Africa?
Between a.d. 400 and 1600, powerful kingdoms and city-states flourished in Africa south of the Sahara. Much ol their power and wealth came from mining and trade.
Arab traders traveled Africa’s east coast exchanging cotton, silk, and porcelain for African ivory and metals. West Africans mined and traded gold, copper, and iron ore. 1’rade with North Africa’s Islamic societies brought wealth and Islamic customs to the West African kingdoms. The kingdoms also traded directly with Europe. The Portuguese set up trading posts along Africa’s western coast in the mid-1400s.
Reading HELPDESK
Ghana—A Trading Empire
Between a.d. 400 and 1100, a vast trading empire known as Ghana emerged in West Africa. Ghana grew wealthy from the taxes it placed on trade. Caravans carrying gold, ivory, and enslaved people crossed the desert to North Africa and returned with salt, cloth, and brass. Such trading contacts led many West Africans to become Muslim.
pilgrimage a journey to a holy place mosque a Muslim house of worship

82 ^^Dloring the Americas
Studios/ Photodisc/ Getty
In 1076 North African people called Almoravids (al»muh»RAH»vihdz) attacked Ghana, disrupting the trade routes in the region. Soon new trade routes bypassed Ghana altogether. The drop in trade led to Ghana’s decline, and new kingdoms emerged in the region.
Mali—Wealth and Power
Mali, one of the new kingdoms, grew very powerful. Mali developed trade routes across the desert to North Africa. By the late 1200s, Mali’s territory was huge. One traveler reported that it took four months to cross it from north to south.
In 1324 Mali’s great king, Mansa Musa, a Muslim, traveled to the Muslim holy city of Makkah (Mecca) in what is now Saudi Arabia. He returned from this religious journey, or pilgrimage (PIHL»gruh»mihj), with an Arab architect. The architect built great mosques (MAHSKS), Muslim houses of worship, in Timbuktu, Mali’s capital. Timbuktu became a center of Islamic art and learning.
The Songhai Empire
In time, the Songhai (sawng»GEYE) people, who lived along the Niger River, overthrew Mali rule. They captured Timbuktu in 1468. Askiya Muhammad, leader of the Songhai Empire, divided Songhai into provinces, each with its own officials. Everyone in the empire followed a legal system based on the teachings of Islam. In the late 1500s, North Africa’s kingdom of Morocco defeated—and ended—the Songhai Empire.
D READING PROGRESS CHECK
Drawing Conclusions What did the Middle East and Africa have that Europeans wanted?
LESSON 1 REVIEW
Review Vocabulary
1.	Examine the two terms that follow. Then write a sentence based on what you have read that explains the connection between the terms. 3oa;3ob
a. astrolabe b. technology
2.	Write a sentence about the classical ideas that were rediscovered during the Renaissance. 3oa;3ob
Answer the Guiding Questions
3.	Explaining How did the rise of Italian city-states help lead to the Renaissance?
4.	Identifying How did new technology pave the way for European voyages of exploration?
5.	Listing What were the three most powerful empires in West Africa between the 400s and 1500s?
PERSUASIVE WRITING
Which ofthe following do you think was the most important innovation, and why?3oo a.	the compass
b.	improved maps
c.	the printing press
Include this lesson's information in your Foldable®

Lesson 1	83

networks
There's More Online!
Ef BIOGRAPHIES
. Christopher Columbus	-d
•	Vasco da Gama	JW
. Queen Isabella
GRAPHIC ORGANIZER
Explorers and Their Sponsors
Ef maps
•	Early Portuguese Exploration . European Voyages of Exploration
Ef self-check quiz VIDEO
Lesson 2
A’.
Early Exploration
riAL QUESTION Why do people trade?
TEKS
Texas Essential Knowledge and Skills 2A Identify reasons for European exploration and colonization of North America.
IT MATTERS BECAUSE
The ornval of the Europeans in the Americas in the fifteenth century changed the lives of people in both the Americas and Europe forever.
The Search for New Trade Routes
guidingquestion Which country took the lead in finding a trade route to India?

Reading HELPDESK
In 1492 Christopher Columbus led 90 sailors in three ships on a voyage into the unknown. As the voyage dragged on, the sailors grew angry. Columbus wrote: “I am told ... that if I persist in going onward, the best course of action will be to throw me into the sea some night.” Before that could happen, a lookout from the ship Pinta made the signal that he had spotted land. On October 12, 1492, Columbus left his ship, the Santa Maria, and went ashore.
Columbus believed he had arrived in the Indies—islands located southeast of China. Actually, he had reached North America. How did Columbus get it so wrong? The maps that he and other European explorers used at the time did not include the Americas because no one in Europe knew they existed. All maps showed three continents—Europe, Asia, and Africa-merged into a huge landmass and bordered by oceans. Some explorers thought that the Western (Atlantic) and Eastern (Pacific) Oceans ran together to form what they called the
Ocean Sea. No one realized the true size of the oceans or the existence of other continents.
Taking Notes: Identifying_______________
As you study the lesson, use a diagram such as this one to identify the explorers who were sponsored by Portugal and those who were sponsored by Spain.
14 Exploring the Americas

Explorers
Sponsored by Portugal
Sponsored by Spain
Content Vocabulary
•	cape
•	circumnavigate

Columbus was sailing on behalf of Spain, but Portugal was the first European power to explore the boundaries of the known world by sea. Unlike Spain, Portugal did not have a port on the Mediterranean Sea. This meant the Portuguese could not use the existing trade routes between Asia and Europe. Portugal’s rulers wanted to find a new route to China and India.
The Portuguese also knew about the great riches in the West African kingdoms. These riches were carried by caravan across the desert to North Africa and then by ship across the Mediterranean. Portuguese traders needed a better route so that they, too, could get West African gold and other riches.
The Beginning of Portuguese Exploration
Portugal’s Prince Henry laid the groundwork for the era of exploration. In about 1420, he set up a center for exploration at Sagres (SAW»grish) on the southwestern tip of Portugal, “where endeth land and where beginneth sea.”
Known as Henry the Navigator, the prince never intended to become an explorer himself. Instead, he planned the voyages and then analyzed the reports that his crews brought home.
At Sagres, Prince Henry set up a school of navigation. There, astronomers, geographers, and mathematicians came to share their knowledge with Portuguese sailors, shipbuilders, and mapmakers. As each successful voyage brought back new information, Henry’s expert mapmakers updated the charts.
Portuguese ships sailed south along the coast of West Africa. As they went south, they traded for gold and ivory and set up trading posts in the region. Because of its abundance of gold, Africa’s west coast came to be known as the “Gold Coast.” In the mid-1400s, Portuguese traders began to buy enslaved Africans there as well.
King John II of Portugal launched new efforts to create a Portuguese trading empire in Asia. All the Portuguese had to do was find a sea route around Africa. If they succeeded, they would be able to trade directly with India and China. They could bypass the North African and Asian caravans and Mediterranean merchants. With that goal in mind, in the 1480s King John urged Portuguese sea captains to explore farther south along the African coast.
Reading Strategy: Reading in the Content Area_
Answers to the questions "What happened?" and "Why did it happen?" fill the pages of history
books. Look for the answers to these questions as you read. It can help your understanding of
history to think of the situations you encounter as a series of cause-and-effect relationships.
The Santa Maria was a sturdy vessel built to survive a long ocean voyage.
CRITICAL THINKING
Drawing Inferences What traits would make a person a good crew member on the Santa Maria?
if

Lesson 2	85
CRITICAL THINKING
Drawing Inferences What can you infer from the fact that Bartolomeu Dias's route hugged Gama's route did not/
30°W

Reading HELPDESK
Bartolomeu Dias
In 1487 Bartolomeu Dias set out from Lisbon with two small caravels and a supply ship. King John had sent Dias to explore the southernmost part of Africa. From there, Dias was to sail northeast into the Indian Ocean. This expedition included some of Portugal’s best pilots.
They sailed for days, staying close to the coast ot Africa. After passing the mouth of the Orange River in South Africa, the expedition met with a fierce storm that carried it southward, off course and out of sight of land. When the winds linally died down, Dias steered east and then north until he found land again. Excitedly, Dias realized that he had already sailed past the southernmost part of Africa. On the way, he had passed a landform called a cape, a piece of land that juts into the water.
Dias set a course back to Portugal. On the return journey, after passing that piece of land again, he wrote that he had been around the “Cape of Storms.” King John renamed it the "Cape of Good Hope.” The king hoped that the passage around Africa might provide a new route to India.
Vasco da Gama
Portugal s voyages to India began years later. In July 1497, after much preparation, Vasco da Gama set sail from Portugal with four ships, headed for Africa. Da Gama’s ships did not hug the
cape a point of land that sticks out into water, much like a peninsula
Word Origins: Changing Meanings__________________
The word pilot used to mean navigator. What does it mean today?
SKILLS PRACTICE
When you see a new word, think about what yoi have seen and done. Does the word remind you anything you have done?

86 Exploring thelaericas
African coast as Dias’s ships had. Instead, they sailed in a wide arc south and west of Africa. They were out of sight of land for more than three months. The purpose of this detour was to reach ocean currents that would help the sailors travel safely around the Cape of Good Hope.
After rounding the cape on November 22, da Gama was on Africa’s eastern coast. He made many stops, including one at Mombasa (mahm»BAH«suh), part of present-day Kenya. There, he met a pilot from India who guided him the rest of the way.
Da Gama reached the port of Calicut, in India, in May 1498. Portugal’s long-held dream of a sea route to Asia was now a reality. Portugal's Trading Empire
Events moved quickly. Within six months of da Gama’s return to Portugal, 13 ships set sail out of Lisbon and headed for India. The ships were commanded by a nobleman, Pedro Alvares Cabral (PEH»droo AWL»vuh*ruhsh kuh»BRAWL).
Cabral planned to follow da Gama’s westward-then-southward course. Instead, he went so far west that he reached Brazil. Cabral claimed Brazil for his king and sent one of the ships back to Portugal with the good news that Portugal now had a foothold in the Americas.
Cabral then continued to India and returned with spices, porcelain, and other valuable cargo. Other Portuguese fleets soon made the journey to India, where Portugal set up permanent forts. Portuguese fleets began to make yearly voyages to India. Their cargoes made the Portuguese capital of Lisbon the marketplace of Europe.
H READING PROGRESS CHECK
Analyzing What was the importance ofthe voyages of Dias and da Gama?
BIOGRAPHY
Vasco da Gama (c. 1460-1524)
Vasco da Gama, who was the son of a Portuguese noble, led two voyages of exploration for Portugal. During the second, he landed at Goa, which later became Portugal's base of power in India. In 1524 the king of Portugal made da Gama Portugal's viceroy, or governor, in India, and he returned to Goa.
CRITICAL THINKING
Drawing Inferences Why do you think the king appointed Vasco da Gama his viceroy in India?
Columbus Crosses the Atlantic
guidingquestion How did Spain and Portugal protect their claims in the Americas?
Keystone/Stringer/Hulton
Born in Genoa, Italy, in 1451, Christopher Columbus became a sailor for Portugal. He traveled as far north as the Arctic Circle and as far south as Africa’s Gold Coast. To reach Asia, Christopher Columbus had a different route in mind than the one used by his Portuguese comrades. He planned to sail west.
In the 1400s, most educated people believed the world was round. People were less certain about Earth’s size. Columbus was among those who based their estimates on the works of Ptolemy (TAHL*uh» mee), an ancient Greek astronomer. Columbus believed Asia was about 2,760 miles (4,441 km) from Portugal—a voyage of about two months by ship. However, Ptolemy had underestimated Earth’s size and, by using Ptolemy s estimate, Columbus did, too.
Lesson 2	87
A bilge pump, operating from the main deck, removed water from storage areas.
THE CARAVEL
Ballast stones were placed in the hull \ to provide better balance.	f
Caravels ranged in length from 75 to 90 feet (23 to 27 m) and were suited for sailing along shallow coastlines.
CRITICALTHINKING
Explaining How did the caravel's lateen sail help sailors? lateen sail
caught wind that blew perpendicular to, or at a right angle to, the ship, making the ship easier to maneuver.
Reading HELPDESK

Academic Vocabulary_____________
devote to commit oneself or one's resources to something alter to change
tloring the Americas
Vikings in North America
Several centuries before the voyages of da Gama, Cabral, and Columbus, northern Europeans, known as Vikings or Norsemen, had sailed to North America. They sailed from present-day Scandinavia to Iceland and Greenland in the 800s and 900s, and established settlements there for a brief period of time. According to Norse sagas, or traditional stories, a Viking sailor named Leif Eriksson explored lands west of Greenland in about the year 1000. The sagas refer to this land as “Vinland.” Ruins from around that period exist in northeastern Canada, which could support the sagas. The Vikings’ voyages were not well known throughout Europe, however. Other Europeans did not “discover” the Americas until Columbus made his historic voyage.
Columbus and Queen Isabella
Columbus had a plan for reaching Asia, but he still needed money to finance his expedition. He visited European monarchs, looking for support. Finally, he found a sponsor in Spain.
For most of the 1400s, Spanish monarchs devoted, or committed, their energy to driving the Muslims out of Spain. Muslims had invaded Spain in the 700s, but their power had been declining for centuries. The last Muslim kingdom in Spain

Reading Strategy: Reading a Diagram_____________
Diagrams may include a cutaway view. This provides a view of the outside and part of the inside of an object at the
same time.
li Dagli/The Art,
fell in 1492. This freed Spain’s monarchs to focus on other goals. The Spanish observed the seafaring and trading successes of neighboring Portugal with envy. They, too, wanted the riches of Asian trade.
King Ferdinand and Queen Isabella of Spain agreed to support Columbus’s expedition for two reasons. One reason was that Columbus promised to bring Christianity to any lands he found. This was important to Isabella because she was a devout Catholic. Another reason was that if he succeeded in finding a route to Asia, Spain would become wealthy from trade with that region. Queen Isabella promised Columbus a share of any riches gained from lands he discovered on his way to Asia.
Columbus's First Voyage
On August 3,1492, Columbus set sail from Palos, Spain. He had two small ships, the Nina and the Pinta, and a larger one, the Santa Maria. Columbus was captain of the Santa Maria, his lead ship, or flagship. The three ships carried about 90 sailors and a six-month supply of food and water.
The small fleet stopped at the Canary Islands off the coast of West Africa for repairs and supplies. Columbus then began the difficult voyage westward across unknown and mysterious stretches of the Atlantic Ocean.
After a few weeks at sea, the sailors grew nervous about the distance they had traveled. Columbus refused to alter his course. Instead, he encouraged the crew by describing the riches he believed they would find. He urged them on, saying that “with the help of our Lord” they would arrive in the Indies.
On October 12,1492, at two o’clock in the morning, a lookout shouted, “Tierra! Tierra!” “Land! Land!” He had spotted a small island in the chain now called the Bahamas. Columbus went ashore, claimed the island for Spain, and named it “San Salvador.” Although he did not know it, Columbus had reached the Americas.
Columbus believed he had arrived in the East Indies, the islands off the coast of Asia. This is why today we call the Caribbean Islands “the West Indies.” It also explains why Columbus called the local people “Indians.” He noted that the natives regarded the Europeans with wonder and often touched the crew members to find out “if they were flesh and bones like themselves.”
When Columbus returned to Spain, Queen Isabella and the Spanish king, Ferdinand, received him with great honor. They made him Admiral of the Ocean Sea and agreed to provide funds for his future voyages.
BIOGRAPHY
Queen Isabella (1451-1504)
Queen Isabella was a Catholic of strong faith. She insisted Columbus treat Native Americans fairly and ordered him to release several enslaved Native Americans he brought to Spain. Isabella hoped to convert the Native Americans to Christianity. She also wanted their labor. She ordered that the Native Americans be forced "to work on... buildings, to mine and collect gold... and to work on... farms and crop fields."
Christopher Columbus (1451-1506)
Columbus proved himself to be a great navigator and sailor. He believed he would discover great riches and new lands. He also knew he could win rich rewards for himself. Columbus wrote in 1492: "Your Highnesses commanded me... [to] go to...
India, and for this accorded me great rewards and ennobled me [raised me to the rank of nobility]."
CRITICAL THINKING
Comparing and Contrasting How were the goals of Queen Isabella and Columbus similar and different?
tS
Lesson 2	89
k
European Voyages of Exploration 1492-1609
John Cabot (1497-1498) Martin Frobisher (1576-1578)
Giovanni da Verrazano (1524)
Jacques Cartier (1535)
Henry Hudson (1609)
Spanish
Christopher Columbus (1492-1493) Amerigo Vespucci (1499-1500)
Portuguese
Pedro Cabral (1500)
1,000 miles
0	1,000 km
Orthographic projec tion
GEOGRAPHY CONNECTION
Beginning in the late 1400s, nations in Western Europe began exploring the Americas.
MOVEMENT
Which explorer traveled along the northern coast of South America? For which country did he sail? CRITICAL THINKING
Analyzing Visuals Study Cabral s route. Based on what you know about Portugal and the information in the map key, explain why his route is labeled To India. Reading HELPDESK
Columbus's Achievements
Columbus made three more voyages for Spain, in 1493, 1498, and 1502. He explored the Caribbean islands of Hispaniola (present-day Haiti and the Dominican Republic), Cuba, and Jamaica. He also sailed along the coasts of Central America and northern South America. He claimed these lands for Spain and started settlements. He also mapped the eastern coastline of Central America.
Columbus had not reached Asia but instead had found a part of the world that was unknown to Europeans, Asians, and Africans. In the years that followed, the Spanish went on to explore most of the Caribbean and to establish the Spanish Empire in the Americas.
Dividing the Americas
Both Spain and Portugal wanted to protect their claims in the Americas. They turned to Pope Alexander VI for help. In 1493 he ordered a line of demarcation, an imaginary line that reached from the North Pole to the South Pole and cut through the middle of the Atlantic Ocean. Spain was to control all lands west of the line, and Portugal would control all lands east of the line.

circumnavigate to travel completely around something, usually by water

Exploring the Americas
Portugal objected, saying that the division gave more land to Spain. In 1494 the two countries signed an agreement called the Treaty of Tordesillas (tohr«daySEE*yuhs), which moved the line farther west. The two countries had divided the entire unexplored world between themselves.
Further Explorations
After Columbus, other voyagers explored the Americas. In 1499 Italian Amerigo Vespucci (veh«SPOO«chee) led a voyage funded by Spain. On this and a later journey for Portugal, he explored the coast of South America. Vespucci realized South America was a separate continent and not part of Asia. European geographers began to call the continent “America” in his honor.
A
Spaniard, Vasco Nunez de Balboa (bal»BOH«uh), heard stories of the “great waters” beyond the mountains of Panama, in Central America. He hiked through steamy rain forests to find them. At the coast in 1513, Balboa saw a vast body of water, which he claimed for Spain along with the adjoining lands. Balboa was the first European to see the Pacific Ocean from the Americas. Sailing Around the World
In 1520 Ferdinand Magellan, a Portuguese explorer who was sailing for Spain, reached the southernmost tip of South America. He sailed through the stormy waters of a narrow sea passage, or strait. The strait led him into a calm ocean—the same one Balboa had seen. The waters were so peaceful—pacifico in Spanish—that
s Magellan named the ocean the Pacific Ocean. Magellan died in I the Philippine Islands, but his crew continued to sail westward,
I arriving back in Spain in 1522. Magellan’s crew were the first | people known to circumnavigate, or sail around, the world.
E8 READING PROGRESS CHECK
I
Evaluating What did Spain have to gain by supporting Columbus and I his voyage? The strait that led Magellan (above) from the Atlantic Ocean to the Pacific Ocean is now called the Strait of Magellan.
li
	° I !	Trade Exploration
Z O
i Circumnavigation Include this lesson's	\	^Con^ertsand” ^Conqvistai^orS .
information in your	I	Gold/Land
Foldable®.	o \ I	"~"|s|ortUvest
L±
Passage LESSON 2 REVIEW -
Answer the Guiding Questions
I
Review Vocabulary
1.	Use the term cape in a sentence about the explorations of Portugal in the late 1400s. 3oa;job
2.	Write a sentence about why it was such an achievement for someone to circumnavigate the globe. 3ob
3.	Identifying Why did Portugal begin exploring the coast of Africa?
4.	Identifying Forwhattwo reasons did King Ferdinand and Queen Isabella support Columbus's expedition?
PERSUASIVE WRITING
Suppose you are an explorer in the 1400s. Write a letter to a European monarch persuading him or her to finance your overseas expedition. Lesson 2	91
networks
There's More Online!
Ef biography
Sor Juana Inesde la Cruz
Ef infographic
Spanish Missions
& MAPS
•	Spanish Explorers
•	Spanish Missions in California
PRIMARY SOURCE
•	Cortes and the Aztecs
Ef self-check quiz

Lesson 3
Spain in America
QUESTION
What are the consequences when cultures interact? yrys Texas Essential Knowledge and Skills
1A Identify the major eras and events in U.S. history through 1877, including colonization, revolution, drafting of the Declaration of Independence, creation and ratification of the Constitution, religious revivals such as the Second Great Awakening, early republic, the Age of Jackson, westward expansion, reform movements, sectionalism, Civil War, and Reconstruction, and describe their causes and effects.
2A Identity reasons for European exploration and colonization of North America.
12B Explain reasons for the development of the plantation system, the transatlantic slave trade, and the spread of slavery.
23C identify ways conflicts between people from various racial, ethnic, and religious groups were resolved.
Reading HELPDESK
It matters because
Spanish explorers in the Americas conquered people and searched for gold. Spain became richer, while many Native Americans suffered from harsh treatment at the hands of the Spaniards.
European Explorers and
Conquerors
guiding question What were the goals of early Spanish explorers?
When Spanish explorers reached the Americas, natives told tales of gold, silver, and kingdoms wealthy beyond belief. 'I he Spanish listened eagerly, and they traveled far and wide in search of these riches.
These explorers, known as conquistadors (kahn*KEES«tah» dohrz), got encouragement from Spanish rulers. The rulers gave conquistadors the right to explore and create settlements in the Americas. In return, the conquistadors agreed to give Spain one-fifth of any treasure they found. This deal allowed Spanish rulers to explore the Americas with little risk. If a conquistador failed, he lost his own fortune. If he succeeded, both he and Spain gained wealth and glory.
The Conquest of Mexico and Peru
Although many of the tales of gold and riches proved to be false, some were true. Two wealthy empires—the Aztec in what is no" Mexico and Central America and the Inca in South America-were among the richest prizes the conquistadors claimed.
In 1519 Hernan Cortes landed on the east coast of present-day ^TkinklUi UKe a -Mexico. Within two years, Cortes conquered the Aztec Empire	t t t CT""Y|T? T A IVT
that had ruled the region. Huge amounts of Aztec gold made	| LI 1D ILJ KJTViN
Cortes and Spain wealthy.
Cortes’s success encouraged other conquistadors. Twelve years after the Aztec conquest, Francisco Pizarro led an army into the Inca capital in Cuzco, in present-day Peru. The Spanish arrested and later executed the Inca ruler. Without their leader, the Inca were not able to fight effectively. Pizarro soon controlled most of the vast and wealthy Inca Empire.
Why Spain Won
The conquistadors’ victories over the Aztec and Inca were quick and lasting. How did Cortes and Pizarro conquer such mighty empires with their small forces?
First, the Spanish had weapons and animals the Aztec and Inca had never seen. The Spanish had guns and cannons.
They rode horses and had huge, ferocious dogs. To the Native Americans, the Spanish seemed almost like gods. One Aztec recalled the fear that spread at the soldiers’ approach: “[TJheir weapons clashed and rattled.... [T]hey terrified everyone who saw them.” Cortes received help from some native people who disliked their harsh rulers and were happy to help overthrow them. Finally, disease played a large role. For
many native groups, contact with the Europeans was deadly. With no immunity, or resistance, to European diseases, the Aztec and the Inca suffered terrible epidemics. Illnesses weakened them in their struggle against the Spanish.
H READING PROGRESS CHECK
Analyzing How were the Spanish able to defeat Native American empires?
Spain in North America
guiding question What did Spain hope to find in the Americas?
Mexico and Peru were lands rich in silver and gold. Hoping to find similar wealth to the north, conquistadors explored the southeastern and southwestern parts of what is today the United States.

Analyzing Primary Sources
In 1519 Hernan Cortes prepared to leave Cuba for Mexico with 11 ships carrying about 550 Spanish soldiers and 16 horses. Before setting off, Cortes said to his men:
PRIMARY SOURCE
“I know in my heart that we shall take vast and wealthy lands, people such as have never before been seen.... If you do not abandon me, as I shall not abandon you, I shall make you in a very short time the richest of all men who have crossed the seas.”
—from The Life of the Conqueror by His Secretary, trans. Lesley Byrd Simpson Based on this quote, what inspired the conquistadors?
Taking Notes: Describing
As you study the lesson, use a graphic organizer like this one to identify three Spanish conquistadors and describe the regions they explored.
^S^^Exploring the Americas
Explorer	Reqion Explored
	
	
	
Content Vocabulary________
•	conquistador • mission
•	immunity • presidio
•	pueblo	•	plantation
conquistador a Spanish explorer immunity resistance, such as to disease
Academic Vocabulary_____________
contact when two or more groups or objects come together
Cortes accepts the surrender of the Aztec ruler.
Lesson 3	93
SorJuana Ines de la Cruz (16517-1695)
Juana Ines de la Cruz was born in ; New Spain, the daughter of a Spanish father and a Creole mother. She ; became a famous writer in a culture I where most women were not taught J to read. Her intelligence and thirst for | learning led her to seek religious J training, which allowed her time to 1 study and write. Her private library | was one ofthe largest in the	J
Americas. In addition to books, she 3 also collected musical and scientific 1 instruments. Recognized as a great / writer in her own lifetime, her	1
poems, plays, and stories were published in the Americas and in	j
Spain. Today, de la Cruz is seen as one 1 ofthe greatest Mexican colonial	j
writers.	I
CRITICAL THINKING
Speculating Why do you think it might have been difficult for de la Cruz to become a successful writer?
Reading HELPDESK
Juan Ponce de Leon (pahn-suh day lee.OHN) made the first Spanish landing on the east coast of present-day Florida in 1513. According to legend, Ponce de Leon was not looking only for gold. He also hoped to find the legendary fountain of youth. This had been described by a historian of that time as a spring of running water of such marvelous virtue that drinking it makes old men young again.” Ponce de Leon s exploration led to the first Spanish settlement in what is now the United States a fort the Spanish built at St. Augustine, Florida, in 1565.
The Seven Cities of Gold
Still other conquistadors searched for quick riches, and several lost their lives in the process. Alvar Nunez Cabeza de Vaca (cuh.BAY.suh duh VAH*cuh) was part of a Spanish expedition to Florida in 1528. After coming into conflict with Native Americans in Florida, the expedition sailed south toward Mexico in November, led by Panfilo de Narvaez (nahr«VAH*ays). Three of its five boats were lost in a storm.
The two boats that made it through the storm became stuck on a beach on an island near present-day Texas. Within a few months, only a handful of the Spanish explorers were still alive. To survive among the Native Americans, de Vaca and an enslaved African named Estevanico (es«TAY»vahn»EE»koh) persuaded the Native Americans that they had healing powers. Cabeza de Vaca later wrote that their method of healing was “to bless the sick, breathing upon them,” and to recite Latin prayers.
In 1533 the Spaniards set off on a long trek across the Southwest. While traveling, they often heard stories about seven rich cities in the region. When Cabeza de Vaca finally arrived in Mexico in 1536, he told eager listeners about the “Seven Cities of Cibola”—seven cities of gold.
De Soto Searches for Gold
Excited by these stories, Hernando de Soto led an expedition to explore Florida and what is today the southeastern United States. For three years they traveled, following stories of gold. Their encounters with the native people often turned violent.
«De Soto crossed the Mississippi River in 1541, describing it as “swift, and very deep.” After traveling as far west as present-
ay Oklahoma, de Soto died of fever. His men buried him in the waters of the Mississippi.
Reading in the Content Area: Map Keys

A map key shows what symbols and colors on the map mean In the map on the next page, the key explains the colors ofthe lines on the map For example, the yellow line represents Ponce de Leon's route in 1513

Exploring the Americas
.............IMIill\w»liU;Nillo;llll<lljllill4°
0	800 km
Lambert Azimuthal Equal-Area projection
Coronado Takes Up the Search
Another conquistador who searched for the Seven Cities of Cibola was Francisco Vasquez de Coronado (kawr»oh»NAH»doh). His travels took him through northern Mexico and present-day Arizona and New Mexico, until his expedition reached a Zuni (ZOO*nee) settlement in 1540. Finally convinced that there was no gold, members of the expedition traveled west to the Colorado River and east into what is now Kansas. They found no gold—only “windswept plains” and strange “shaggy cows” (buffalo).
H READING PROGRESS CHECK
Speculating Why do you think that the encounters between de Soto's party and Native Americans were sometimes violent?
Life Under Spanish Rule
The Granger Collection, NYC
GUIDING QUESTION
What effect did Spanish rule have on society? Spanish law set up three kinds of settlements in the Americas— pueblos, missions, and presidios. Pueblos, or towns, were centers of trade. Missions were religious communities. They included a church, a small town, and fields for crops. A presidio was a type of fort and was usually built near a mission.
Juan de Onate (day ohn«YAH«tay) traveled up from Mexico to establish a Spanish presence in the lands to the north. He was also assigned to convert the native people to Christianity.
SKILLS PRACTICE
Keep a list of words you hear often during class lessons and discussion. Use these words in class discussion.
Lesson 3	95
Mission Nuestra Senora de la Purisima Concepcion de Acuna, located in San Antonio, Texas, was dedicated in 1755 after 20 years of construction. All missions had the same basic plan and were located near wood, water, and land for farming and grazing. There was a church, housing for the priests and Native American converts, grain fields with irrigation ditches, and corrals for cattle, sheep, and goats.
Reading HELPDESK
In 1598 Onate founded, or established, the province of New Mexico. He introduced cattle and horses to the Pueblo people. The first Spanish city in the southwest, Santa he, was established in 1607. Santa Fe became the capital of the province in 1610
Spanish Colonial Society
There was a very clear class system in Spanish colonial society. The highest level of society was made up of the penbisulares, people who were born in Spain. They were the landowners, leaders of government, and heads of the Catholic Church. Next in rank were the Creoles, people born in the Americas whose parents were Spanish. The next level below were the mestizos (meh«STEE«zohs), people with one Spanish and one Native American parent. Still lower were the Native Americans, most of whom lived in great poverty, and enslaved Africans.
The Spanish government granted conquistadors who settled in the Americas the right to demand either taxes or labor from Native Americans living on the land. This system forced the Native Americans into a form of slavery.
For example, in the 1540s, when the Spanish discovered silver ore in northern Mexico, they set up mining camps. They then forced Native Americans to dig for silver. The damp mineshafts were a grueling environment in which to work. Many Native Americans died there from malnutrition and disease.
pueblo a town in the Spanish-ruled lands mission a religious community where farming was carried out and Native Americans were converted to Christianity
presidio a fort plantation a large farm
Academic Vocabulary
found to start, to establish
9^^ Exploring the Americas
A
Spanish priest, Bartolome de Las Casas, spoke out against such cruel treatment of Native Americans and pleaded for laws to protect them. He claimed that millions had died because the Spanish “made gold their ultimate aim, seeking to load themselves with riches in the shortest possible time.” Las Casas’s reports convinced Spanish leaders to pass the New Laws in 1542. These laws forbade enslaving Native Americans. Unfortunately, the laws were not always enforced. The Plantation System
Not all Spaniards sought gold. Some found wealth shipping crops to Spain. In the West Indies, key exports were tobacco and sugarcane. The Spanish developed the plantation system to raise these crops. A plantation is a large farm.
The Spanish first used Native American labor to work their plantations. Las Casas suggested that they be replaced by enslaved Africans—a suggestion he bitterly regretted later. As a result, thousands of enslaved Africans were brought from West Africa to the Americas. Those who survived the brutal voyage were sold to plantation owners. By the late 1500s, slave labor was an essential part of the economy of the colonies.


■ i A fC '
San Diego deAlcaid
(1769) »
San Carlos Borrome* de Carmelo] (1770)
San Antonio de Pi
San Luis Obispo de Tok (17:
PACIFIC OCEAN
100 miles I
0	100 km
Albers Equal-Area projection
GEOGRAPHY CONNECTION
By 1820 there were 21 missions along the California portion of El Camino Real, "the royal road."
LOCATION
What was the i southernmost Spanish mission?	>
II
CRITICAL THINKING |
Drawing Conclusions Why do	i
you think so many missions were	|
located along waterways?	|
Lesson 3	97
Connections to
TODAY
Our Spanish Heritage
Spanish influence in the United States is strong. Many Spanish words have been incorporated into the language, such as “fiesta” and “canyon.” The Spanish, who were expert ranchers, introduced animals such as horses, sheep, pigs, and beef cattle into the American Southwest. Many place names in the United States today are Spanish in origin. Some examples in the text are Santa Fe and California. Can you think of any others?
Include this lesson's information in your Foldable®.
Spanish Settlement in the Southwest
In the 1600s and 1700s, the Spanish, with much help from Native Americans, settled the Southwest, including present-day
New Mexico, Texas, and California.
The Spanish explorer Juan Cabrillo (kuh.BREE.yoh) first
sighted what is now California in 1542. However, for 200 years the Spanish had left the area alone. Around 1769, that policy changed. California was the northern frontier of the Spanish Empire in North America, and Spain needed a large number of colonists to solidify its hold on the region. Spain also wanted to convert more Native Americans to Christianity.
Spanish settlement in California consisted mostly of mission building. The Spaniards trained Native Americans who lived on the mission to be farmers. They learned how to grow crops, irrigate farmland, and perform other tasks usually carried out on a ranch. Eventually, the missions became economically profitable enough to sell some of their goods, such as wine, olive oil, and leather.
Effect on Native American Life
California’s many Native American groups had well-ordered societies before the Spanish arrived. They' hunted, fished, and gathered plants for food. The arrival of the Spanish disrupted this way of life. The Spanish forced native peoples to convert to Christianity and to live and work at the missions.
Q READING PROGRESS CHECK
Summarizing What kinds of settlements did the Spanish build in the Americas?
1
LESSON 3 REVIEW
TEKS
Review Vocabulary
1.	Use the following content vocabulary terms to write a short paragraph about Spanish settlement in the Americas. 3oa
a.	pueblo c. presidio
b.	mission d. plantation
Answer the Guiding Questions
2.	Identifying Why did the conquistadors want to conquer and settle the Americas? 2a
98 Exploring the Americas
3.	Explaining Why was 1513 a significant year in the history of the Americas?
4.	Explaining Why did the Spanish bring Africans to their colonies in the Americas?
DESCRIPTIVE WRITING
The conquistadors are often described as possessing both good and bad qualities. Write a paragraph in which you express what you think were the qualities, both good and bad, of the Spanish conquistadors. 3od Reading HELPDESK
Taking Notes: t/st/ng________________
As you study the lesson, use a diagram like this to list the explorers who tried to find a Northwest Passage.
networks
There's More Online!
GAME
Column Game Ef graphic organizer
The Northwest Passage
IMAGES
•	Jacques Marquette and Louis Joliet
•	New Amsterdam
sf SELF-CHECK QUIZ Ef VIDEO
ML
Lesson 4
Competing for Colonies


TIAL QUESTION
What are the consequences when cultures interact? it matters because
The European competition for colonies in the Americas led to settlement and exploration in many parts of North America.
TEKS
Texas Essential Knowledge and Skills 1A Identify the major eras and events in U.S. history through 1877, including colonization, revolution, drafting of the Declaration of Independence, creation and ratification of the Constitution, religious revivals such as the Second Great Awakening, early republic, the Age of Jackson, westward expansion, reform movements, sectionalism, Civil War, and Reconstruction, and describe their causes and effects.
2A Identify reasons for European exploration and colonization of North America.
Religious Rivalries
guidingquestion M/ftflf were the religious motives behind the A ge of Exploration?
The Europeans who explored and settled in North America in the 1500s sought wealth. They also wanted to spread their Christian faith. The first to arrive were Roman Catholics—the only Christian church in the western part of Europe at that time. Not long after Columbus made his first voyage across the Atlantic, however, religious conflict shook Europe. New rivalries based on religious beliefs emerged.
Luther and the Reformation
In 1517 a German priest named Martin Luther nailed a list of complaints on the door of a local Catholic church, questioning the power and authority of Catholic leaders—including the pope, the head of the Catholic Church. Luther hoped to spark reform within the Church, but Pope Leo X rejected his ideas. Others agreed with Luther. His ideas helped launch a movement called the Reformation (reh«fuhr«MAY»shuhn). The movement led to a new form of Christianity called Protestantism (PRAH*tuhs«tuhn«tih»zuhm). Among the differences between Protestants and Catholics was that Protestants did not accept the leadership of the pope. The Reformation led to widespread conflict within and between the nations of Europe.

Search for the Northwest Passage
Content Vocabulary
•	Reformation
•	Protestantism
•	armada
•	Northwest Passage
•	tenant farmer
Lesson 4	99
In 1639 a French woman named Marie Guyard, or Marie of the Incarnation, arrived in Quebec, Frances first colony. Later, she wrote religious books in the languages of the native peoples she met there. In a letter, Guyard wrote:
PRIMARY SOURCE
“You will perhaps laugh that at the age of fifty years I am beginning to study a new tongue [language], but one must undertake all things for the service of God and the salvation of ones neighbour.”
—from Word From New France, by Marie Guyard
Religious Rivalry in Europe
In 1533 the English king, Henry VIII, left the Catholic Church. Later, during the rule of his daughter Elizabeth I, further reforms established England as a Protestant nation. At that time, it was common for kings and queens to insist that their subjects follow their religion. Subjects who did not could lose their lands and fortunes. In England, many people were unhappy about leaving the Catholic Church, but they had little power to resist.
England’s Protestantism caused conflict with Spain. Beginning in 1585, King Philip of Spain made plans to invade England. A successful invasion could mean the overthrow of Protestantism. In May 1588, Philip sent an armada (ahr.MAH.duh), or war fleet, of 132 ships to England. With 30,000 troops and more than 2,000 guns, the Spanish Armada was the mightiest naval force in the world. Yet the smaller, faster English ships quickly gained the upper hand.
The defeat of Spain’s armada marked the end of Spanish control of the seas. Now the way was clear for the English to start colonies in North America.
From her letter, what do you know about the person and character of Marie Guyard?
Religious Rivalries in the Americas
Catholics from Spain and France worked to spread their faith among the Native Americans. The Spanish settled in the southwestern and southeastern regions of North America, and the French settled in the northeast. Dutch and English Protestants set up colonies along the Atlantic coast between the French and the Spanish settlements. Religious differences contributed to the rivalries between these settlements.
Reading HELPDESK
Search for a Northwest Passage
In the 1500s and early 1600s, England, France, and the Netherlands sent explorers to map the coast of North America and, later, establish trade and colonies. Explorers also hoped to discover a Northwest Passage to Asia, a direct water route through the Americas.
England sent John Cabot, an Italian, to look for a northern sea route to Asia in 1497. Cabot probably landed on the coast of present-day Newfoundland. In 1524 France hired another Italian, Giovanni de Verrazano, to look for a northern route. Verrazano explored the coast of North America from present-day Nova Scotia down to the Carolinas.

Reformation a sixteenth-century religious movement rejecting orchanging some Roman Catholic teachings and practices and establishing the Protestant churches
Protestantism a form of Christianity that
was in opposition to the Catholic Church armada a fleet of warships
Academic Vocabulary __
widespread over a wide area
the^j^icas
flk

100 Exploring the
In 1609 Henry Hudson and his crew landed on the shores of Delaware Bay. The native people offered goods for trade.
In 1535 French explorer Jacques Cartier (kahr«tee«AY) sailed up the St. Lawrence River, hoping it would lead to the Pacific. Cartier did not make it to the Pacific, but he discovered a mountain peak that he named Mont-Royal, which means “royal mountain.” This is the site of the present-day city of Montreal.
The Netherlands also wanted to find a passage through the Americas. The Dutch hired English sea explorer and navigator Henry Hudson to look for it. In 1609 he discovered the river that now bears his name. In his ship, the Half Moon, Hudson sailed north on the Hudson River as far as the site of present-day Albany, New York. Deciding that he had not found a passage to India, he turned back.
The following year England sent Hudson to try again. On this trip, Hudson discovered a huge bay—now called Hudson Bay. Thinking he had reached the Pacific, Hudson spent months looking for an outlet. His crew became impatient and rebelled. They set Hudson, his son, and a few sailors adrift in a small boat, never to be seen again.
B READING PROGRESS CHECK
Analyzing Why did nations want to find a Northwest Passage?

Northwest Passage a sea passage between the Atlantic and the Pacific along the north coast of North America
SKILLS PRACTICE_______________________________
Work with a partner. Take turns describing something. Ask one another questions about the details.
Lesson 4
101
k
In 1673 Father Jacques Marquette and Louis Joliet located the great Mississippi River. They hoped to find that the river led to the Pacific Ocean.
French and Dutch Settlements
guidingquestion How did French and Dutch settlements compare to the Spanish
CRITICAL THINKING
colonies?

Explaining In what way was Marquette and Joliet's expedition successful? Unsuccessful?
Reading HELPDESK
French explorers and settlers trailed the Spanish by many years, but the French did establish settlements in North America. At first,
the French were most interested in natural resources, including fish and furs. French trappers went far into the interior ol North America and traded with Native Americans. France built forts to protect its trade. French missionaries followed the traders.
In 1663 New France became a royal colony. The new royal governor supported expanded exploration.
c^pivnng me ivussissippi River
In the 1670s, two French explorers—a fur trader, Louis Joliet, and a priest, Jacques Marquette—traveled the Mississippi River by canoe. Joliet and Marquette hoped to find precious metals. They were also looking for a Northwest Passage. When they realized that the Mississippi flowed south into the Gulf of Mexico rather than west into the Pacific, they headed back upriver.
In 1682 Robert Cavelier de La Salle followed the Mississippi all the way to the Gulf of Mexico. He claimed the region for France, calling it Louisiana in honor of Louis XIV. In 1718 the French founded New Orleans. French explorers and missionaries traveled west to the Rocky Mountains and the Rio Grande.

tenant farmer a settler who pays rent	Academic Vocabulary
Or DrovirlPS work tn a lanrlnu/npr in nyrhanno	'	————~
pose to present; to offer
or provides work to a landowner in exchange for the right to use the landowner's land
102 Exploring the Americas
New France and New Netherland
French settlement in North America advanced slowly. New France was made up of estates along the St. Lawrence River.
Estate holders brought in settlers in exchange for land. These settlers became tenant farmers (TEH*nuhnt), who paid rent and worked for their lord for a set period each year.
The French got along well with the Native Americans. French trappers and missionaries lived among them, learned their languages, and respected their ways. The missionaries had come to convert Native Americans to Catholicism, but they did not try to change their customs. Because the French colony grew slowly, it did not seem to pose a threat to the Native Americans and their lands.
The Netherlands was a small country with few natural resources and limited farmland. This is why the Dutch were eager to set up a North American colony. After Hudson’s voyage in 1609, the Dutch began to explore North America.
The Netherlands also had a large fleet of trading ships that sailed all over the world. In 1621 the Netherlands created the Dutch West
India Company to run its trade between the Americas and Africa.
In 1623 the company took over control of the Dutch colony in North America, called “New Netherland.”
The heart of the colony was New Amsterdam. The town was built on the tip of Manhattan Island. In 1626 governor	y
Peter Minuit bought the island from the Manhattoes people for 60 Dutch guilders (about $24) worth of trade goods.
B READING PROGRESS CHECK
Explaining What were France's goals in North America?
Foldables
s Study Organizer
Include this lesson's information in your Foldable®
o	Trade
	Exploration
o	CiroJtnaaVigdtian 'Sn^estsand” _Co^’stadors_
o	.	Gold/Land tdortlnwest S	Passage
The Dutch hoped New Amsterdam, located where the Hudson River enters what is now New York Harbor, would become an important center for their trade.
CRITICAL THINKING
Analyzing Which characteristics of the region of New Amsterdam might encourage trade for Dutch settlers?
LESSON 4 REVIEW
Review Vocabulary
1.	Explain the meaning of the terms armada and Protestantism by using both in a sentence. 3oa;3ob
2.	Explain the significance of the term tenant farmer.
30A
Answer the Guiding Questions
3.	Identifying For what reasons did the English, French, and Dutch establish colonies in
North America? 2A
4.	Analyzing What effect did the defeat of the Spanish Armada have on England?
5.	Identifying Why did Louis Joliet and Jacques Marquette set out to explore the Mississippi River? 2A
NARRATIVE WRITING
Write a letter to a relative in Europe from the point of view of an early French or Dutch settler in North America. Describe what life is like and what your goals are in North America. 29d,-3od
Lesson 4 103
3 Activities Jty
Directions: Write your answers using standard grammar, spelling, sentence structure, and punctuation.
OUse your I'SIWilTfOto explore the Essential Questions.
expository writing What was the main reason European nations explored North America? In your opinion, was it to spread religion, gain wealth, search for the Northwest Passage, bring honor to their rulers, or control natural resources? Select one reason, then write two or more paragraphs defending your choice. Use examples to support your view. 2a; 29e; 3od
© Social Studies Skills
CREATING A THEMATIC MAP
Work in a group of five to map the routes of Columbus, Magellan, Cabral, Cabot and La Salle. Each member should research one explorer, then trace the route of that explorer on a single map large enough to display in the classroom. Each member contributes a short paragraph on the explorer, describing his adventures and importance. 291; 3od © Thinking Like a Historian
CREATING CHARTS
With a partner, create a comparison chart of two countries that were exploring the Americas during this era. Include in the chart (a) areas explored; (b) major waterways; and (c) population or settlements. Write three questions about the information that can be answered from the chart. Exchange your chart and questions with another team, and answer the questions they provided. 29b,-29I; 293300 © Visual Literacy
DRAWING INFERENCES
This painting shows Coronado leading an expedition into New Mexico. What does this image suggest about the way the Spanish conquistadors viewed their role in the lands they explored? Explain your answer. 29b,-29d 104
>e Americas
Assessment
Directions: Write your answers using standard grammar, spelling, sentence structure, and punctuation.
CHECKING FOR UNDERSTANDING
O
Among the causes of European exploration and colonization were the rise of a new spirit of adventure and the competition among nations for new trade routes and gold. What were some of the effects of this competition? Write a paragraph explaining your answer. ia;jod REVIEW THE GUIDING QUESTIONS
0 Identifying What were some of the technological advancements that paved the way for European voyages of exploration? 2A
0 Explaining Why did the rise of new nations during the Renaissance set the stage for a new era of exploration and discovery? 2A
O
Analyzing Why did King Ferdinand and Queen Isabella of Spain agree to finance Columbus's expedition? 2A;29D 0 Describing How did the Pacific Ocean get its name?
0 Stating What was the main reason the Spanish conquered and colonized the Aztec and Inca? 2A
0 Explaining Why did slavery spread in the Spanish colonies? ub
0 Identifying What religious rivalry in Europe shaped the exploration of the Americas? 2A
0 Explaining Why were the Dutch eager to set up a colony in North America? ia;2a
CRITICAL THINKING
0 Contrasting European nations had different reasons for exploring overseas. How did Portuguese efforts to reach Asia differ from Columbus's efforts? 2A;29B
0 Comparing Compare how the Spanish and the French interacted with the environment. nc;29B
0 Contrasting How did Spain's exploration and colonization in the Americas differ from England's?
2A;29B
0 Interpreting Maps Using the map in Lesson 3, Spanish Missions in California, complete the following tasks: ib;29C;29h
a.	List the missions in chronological order beginning with the first one Serra built.
b.	Calculate the number of years that elapsed between the building of the first mission and the last.
(£> Interpreting Maps Using the Place and Time map in this chapter showing European exploration, answer the following questions: 29c
a.	Which regions in North America were controlled by European nations?
b.	When did Vespucci make his voyage?
c.	For what two countries did Henry Hudson sail?
Describing Spanish priest Bartolome de las Casas devoted most of his life to speaking out for the rights of enslaved Native Americans. He believed that taking away the freedom and property of indigenous people was contrary to the Christian faith. Use the Internet to find information about Las Casas and write a description of one incident in his life in which he spoke out for freedom, job
Need Extra Help?
IfYou've Missed Question	O	O	O	O	0	0	0	0	0	0	0	0	0	0	0
Review Lesson	1,2,3	1	1	2	2	3	3	4	4	2	3,4	2,3,4	3	1,2,3	3
105
Numb. L,
New-York Weekly JOURNAL.
Containing the frefbe/l Advice/, Foreign, and Dont/flick.
The
MV
Kdj ? Q&ober j^/h, 1734. Mr. Zenger ;
T
Have been Reading, the arguments of Mr. Smith, and Murray, with Regard to the Courts, and there is one Thing, I can’t comprehend, w'r, If it is the fame Court, I tike it, that all rhe Writs ought to be .taken out in England, and tefted by the Judges there i if they are taken out here, the fa nw judges outht to tell them here, ’'it is a like Court, it is not the r.e and if not the fame, it is not mat fundamental Court which is e-flabitihed hy. intmawml CttSom. I would be glad feme of your Corref-jxtttdents would clear up this Point-, Iwcanfc in my poor Opptnton, if the Exchequer Court here is not the fame identical Court as the Exchequer Court in England, it is without Lawful Authority.
lelves in Great Poland iw d_. „ -*. Crown
—Sff.sK Sreig&SE'frk**--'
fokeion „Fj(Us Dantziet, Jurafi ,
m tbSX J"	C^.
very maUUr. hPE?
f w his Departure, SffiL	• be'
1-iia for holding of £pe±i?On^’
Ruiltan and Saxon Trooro Sai , ftddenlv 10 the PlS	1,1 rnarcl»
~ intent Guards forrnet vice of King Staoirtaus.
Bnffelt, dt&tfi 6.
Letters from Rome of the 17thp.fi advife. That they had Advice then that the Siege ofGaeta was not JNfj formed, altho* the Spaniards w there 70 Cannon, and Mortars, and went working' on. Batteries, but fteft all they raifed in the Night was beat down next Morning by the Cannon of the Palace j and that the Heats being already Excdfive, the Spaniards were in Fear of loafing a vail Number of Men in the Redu&ioa of that Fort refs.
Hamburg, duguft IO. According to Letters from theCa mp before Danrzick, the Vefiels there were taken up by Order ofthe Generals in Chief, to ferve for carrying the heavy Artillery and Baggage by Water to Thorn and Warfaw,
We have certain Advice, that King, Staniflaus was departed from Brandenburg Pruffia, and arrived fafe in the Crown Army, under the Command of M. Kiowfki, near Peterkow the 34th part, and immedtatelyafterwards held a Council of War, wherein it was refolved to draw all the difperfed Troops into a Body, and march di-refily to Volhinia in Podolia.
Amfl,
In 1733 publisher John Peter Zenger, in his newspaper the New-York Weekly Journal, accused New York’s governor of corruption. For criticizing the governor, officials charged Zenger with a crime and threw him in jail. Zenger argued that the statements he had published about the governor were true. Therefore, he claimed, he had the right to publish them. Zenger’s lawyer, Andrew Hamilton, made a stirring defense:
PRIMARY SOURCE
John Peter Zenger's newspaper, the New-York Weekly Journal, was the battleground in an early case about freedom ofthe press.
civic virtue the democratic ideas, practices, and values that are at the heart of citizenship in a free society

%
66 The loss of liberty in general would soon follow the suppression ofthe liberty ofthe press; for it is an essential branch of liberty, so perhaps it is the best preservative ofthe whole. 99
—from The Trial of John Peter Zenger and the Birth of Freedom ofthe Press, by Doug Linder
The jury found Zenger not guilty. The case is seen as a key step in the development of a free press in this country.
Civic Virtue
Colonists were beginning to form new ideas of freedom.
They began thinking in terms of civic virtue (SNvihk VUHR.choo)—democratic ideas, practices, and values that form a truly free society. De Crevecoeur was writing about these ideals when he described the spirit ofthe new American. Benjamin Franklin was a shining example of civic virtue at its best. Colonists would soon put their belief in civic virtue into action. These ideas and actions would become the building blocks of a new nation.
O READING PROGRESS CHECK
netw@rks
There's More Online!	JY
Ef biography
Pontiac	gjslB
Ef GRAPHIC ORGANIZER
Native American Relations With the Europeans
sf IMAGE George Washington and the French and Indian War
Ef MAP The French and Indian War
sf PRIMARYSOURCE
Political Cartoon
gf SELF-CHECK QUIZ ef VIDEO

. -..............................................,•



Lesson 4
Rivalry in North America
it matters Because
Include this lesson's information in your Foldable®.


Analyzing In what ways did the First Great Awakening influence American society?
TEKS
Texas Essential Knowledge and Skills 1A Identify the major eras and events in U.S. history through 1877, including colonization, revolution, drafting ofthe Declaration of Independence, creation and ratification ofthe Constitution, religious revivals such as the Second Great Awakening, early republic, the Age of Jackson, westward expansion, reform movements, sectionalism, Civil War, and Reconstruction, and describe their causes and effects.
4A Analyze causes ofthe American Revolution, including the Proclamation of 1763, the Intolerable Acts, the Stamp Act, mercantilism, lack of representation in Parliament, and British economic policies following the French and Indian War 10C Analyze the effects of physical and human geographic factors on major historical and contemporary events in the United States.
11C Describe how different immigrant groups interacted with the environment in the United States during the 17th, 18th, and 19th centuries.
Rivalry between Great Britain and France led to a war for control of North America and set the stage for a dispute between the colonists and Great Britain.
LESSON 3
Review Vocabulary
1.	Describe how each ofthe following terms relates to culture and society in the thirteen colonies. 3oa
a. immigration b. epidemic c. apprentice	d. civic virtue
Answer the Guiding Questions
2.	Explaining What were the typical family responsibilities of husbands and wives in colonial America?
Life in the American Colonies
3.	Explaining How did the Enlightenment and ideas of civic virtue influence colonists' beliefs about government? 3c
EXPOSITORY WRITING
In a paragraph, explain the factors that contributed to population growth in the thirteen colonies in the 1600s and 1700s. 3od Content Vocabulary
•	militia
•	Iroquois Confederacy
•	alliance
Rivalry Between the French and the British
guidingquestion Howdid competition for land in North America lead to the French and Indian War?
In the 1700s, Britain and France were leading European powers. They competed for wealth and empire in different parts of the world. In North America, their rivalry was very strong.
This rivalry turned especially bitter in the mid-1700s. The British began to show interest in the Ohio River valley. This vast land beyond the Appalachian Mountains was rich in resources. The British believed they had a right to this land. The French also viewed the valley as theirs. The French enjoyed a thriving fur trade with the Native Americans of the region. They did not want to share this business with British settlers.
To protect their claims in the valley, the French built a chain of forts from Lake Ontario south to the Ohio River. The British responded by starting to build a fort in what is now western Pennsylvania. Before they could finish, the French seized the site. On it, they built their own fort, calling it Fort Duquesne
Lesson 4 151
Although Washington suffered defeat at Fort Necessity, the colonists viewed him as the hero who had struck the first blow against the French.
In spring 1754, the governor of Virginia sent a militia (muh»LIH»shuh)—a military force made up of ordinary citizens—to drive out the French. Leading this force was a young Virginian. His name was George Washington.
After marching to Fort Duquesne, Washington set up a small fort of his own nearby. He called it Fort Necessity.
Washington’s outpost soon came under attack by the French and their Native American allies. This combined army won the battle and forced Washington’s soldiers to surrender. The French later released the soldiers, who returned to Virginia.
Native American Alliances
SKILLS PRACTICE______________
Retell important sentences from a text selection, using your own words.
Reading HELPDESK
As the conflict got under way, the French and the British both sought Native American help. The French had a big advantage. They already had many Native American allies. Native Americans generally distrusted the British and their hunger tor land. In contrast, the French were more interested in lur trading than in land. French trappers and fur traders often married Native American women. French missionaries converted many Native Americans to Catholicism. For these reasons, Native Americans helped the French and raided British settlements.
To counter the threat of the French and their Native American friends, the British colonists tried to make a treaty with the Iroquois. The Iroquois Confederacy (IHR«uh«kwoy kuhn»FEH«du*ruh«see) was the most powerful group of Native Americans in eastern North America. At that time, the confederacy included six nations—the Mohawk, Seneca, Cayuga, Onondaga, Oneida, and Tuscarora. Delegates—representatives— from seven colonies met with Iroquois leaders at Albany,
New York, in June 1754. The Iroquois refused an alliance (uh»LY*uhns), or partnership, with the British. They did, however, promise to remain neutral—that is, to take no side.
The Albany delegates also talked about how the colonies might work together more closely against the French. They decided to adopt Benjamin Franklin’s Albany Plan of Union for a united colonial government. To form a colonial government, each colony would have to give up some of its powers. Not one colonial assembly
militia a military force made up of ordinary citizens alliance Iroquois Confederacy a group of Native American nations in eastern North America joined together under one general government
152 Life in the American Colonies
partnership	Academic Vocabulary _________________-
convert to change the religious beliefs of someone
neutral taking no side
was willing to do so. Disappointed, Franklin wrote, “Everybody cries, a Union is absolutely necessary; but when they come to the manner and form of the union, [they] are perfectly distracted.”
The Albany meeting failed to unify the colonists. Meanwhile, the conflict between the British and the French expanded into full-scale war—the French and Indian War.
READING PROGRESS CHECK
Identifying Cause and Effect Why did hostilities between the French and British increase during the mid-1700s?
The French and Indian War
guiding question What was the turning point in the French and Indian War?
The French enjoyed early success in the war. They captured several British forts. Meanwhile, their Native American allies carried out raids on the frontier, or edges, of the colonies. They killed colonists, burned farmhouses and crops, and drove many families back toward the coast.
The turning point came in 1757 when William Pitt became prime minister, the head of the British government. Pitt was a great military planner. He sent more trained British troops to fight in North America. To stop colonial complaints about the cost of the war, Pitt decided that Britain would pay for it. He knew that, after the war, the British would raise colonists’ taxes to help pay the large bill. Pitt had only delayed the time when the colonists would have to pay their share of the military costs.
Pitt’s goal was not just to open the Ohio River valley. He also wanted to conquer French Canada. In 1758 British forces won a key victory at Fort Louisbourg in present-day Nova Scotia.
The same year, a British force made up mostly of New York and New England militia captured Fort Frontenac at Lake Ontario.
Analyzing Primary Sources
America’s first political cartoon, drawn by Benjamin Franklin in 1754, promoted his Albany Plan of Union. Each section represents a colony. The New England Colonies are combined as one section. What warning does the cartoon convey about the approaching war with France?
After a month-long siege, Major General James Wolfe ordered British forces to cross the St. Lawrence River and climb the cliffs near the city of Quebec. In less than an hour, French troops fled, and the city fell.
200 miles
mJ

GEOGRAPHY CONNECTION
During the French and Indian War, the British and the French fought for control of the lands between their North American territories.
LOCATION
Where are the cities of Quebec and Montreal located? CRITICAL THINKING
Analyzing Why do you think Quebec and Montreal were related to French dominance in the Ohio River valley? Reading HELPDESK
Another British force finally took Fort Duquesne. The British renamed it Fort Pitt.
Quebec, the capital of New France, sat on a cliff above the St. Lawrence River. Because of its position, Quebec was thought to be impossible to attack. In September 1759, British scouts spotted a poorly guarded path along the back of the cliff. At night, British general James Wolfe’s soldiers overwhelmed the French guards and scrambled up the path. The British troops then surprised and defeated the French army on a field called the Plains of Abraham. The fall of Quebec and of Montreal the next year marked the defeat of France in North America.
Fighting between Britain and France and their respective allies continued in Europe and elsewhere until the war was final! ended with the Treaty of Paris of 1763. This treaty forced France to give Canada and most of its lands east of the Mississippi Riyer to Great Britain. Great Britain also received Florida from Frances ally, Spain. Spain acquired French lands west of the Mississippi River—called Louisiana—as well as the port of New Orleans.
The Treaty of Paris marked the end of France as a power in North America. In its aftermath, North America was in the hands of two European powers—Great Britain and Spain.
H READING PROGRESS CHECK
Explaining Why was William Pitt successful at managing the war for Britain

Reading Strategy: Finding the Main Idea__________________________________________________
in most paragraphs, the main idea appears near the beginning. The rest of the paragraph often gives examples or details to help you understand the main idea. Read the first paragraph under the Guiding Question on the next page. Identify the main idea of the paragraph and three supporting details.
054 Life in the American Colonies

New British Policies
GUIDING QUESTION
How did the American colonists react to new British policies? The French defeat was a blow to Native Americans in the Ohio River valley. They lost their French allies and trading partners and now had to deal with the British. The British raised the prices of their goods. Unlike the French, the British refused to pay Native Americans to use their land. Worst of all, more colonists began settling in Native American lands.
Many Native Americans saw the settlers as a threat to their way of life. One of these was Pontiac, the chief of an Ottawa village near Detroit. In 1763 Pontiac and his forces captured the British fort at Detroit and other British outposts. During Pontiac’s War, Native Americans killed settlers along the Pennsylvania and Virginia frontiers.
The same year that Pontiac’s War began, Britain’s King George declared that colonists were not to settle west of the Appalachian Mountains. To enforce the new rule, the British planned to keep 10,000 troops in America. The Proclamation of 1763 helped remove a source of conflict with Native Americans. It also kept colonists on the coast—where the British could control them.
Colonists believed the proclamation limited their freedom of movement. They feared that the large number of British troops might interfere with their liberties. As a result, distrust began to grow between Britain and its American colonies.
Britain’s financial problems also led to trouble. Deeply in debt as a result of the war with France, the British government made plans to tax the colonies and tighten trade rules. These efforts would lead to conflict. Although no one knew it at the time, the end of the French and Indian War was also the start of a new era
z
I in history—the American Revolutionary Era.
H REAPING PROGRESS CHECK
I
Examining Why did the Proclamation of 1763 anger colonists? BIOGRAPHY
Pontiac, c. 1720-1769
Pontiac became an Ottawa chief while still a young man. A born leader, he brought together three Native American groups—the Ottawa, the Potawatomi, and the Ojibwa—in an alliance. As more British settlers moved into their lands, he convinced more groups to join. Based on Pontiac's plans, these groups attacked British forts and settlements. Pontiac himself led the successful attack on the fort at Detroit. Pontiac agreed to peace with the British in July 1766. Afterward, his allies turned against him.
CRITICAL THINKING
Drawing Conclusions Why do you think Pontiac's former allies turned against him?
			
			
Include this lesson's			
information in your				
Foldable®.	%		
LESSON 4 REVIEW
Review Vocabulary
1.	Write a sentence using the terms alliance and Iroquois Confederacy. 3oa
2.	Write a sentence about the colonies, using the word militia. 3oa
Answer the Guiding Questions
3.	Analyzing Why was the Ohio River valley a source of conflict between the French, Native Americans, and British in the mid-1700s? ioc
4.	Identifying What was the role of William Pitt in the French and Indian War?
5.	Analyzing Why did Britain decide to tax the colonies and tighten trade rules after the French and Indian War, and why do you suppose that upset the colonists? 4A
EXPOSITORY WRITING
Write a paragraph that summarizes the Albany Plan of Union, including the problems it was meant to address and the response it received among the colonies. 29B;3od Lesson 4 155
Activities
Directions: Write your answers using standard grammar, spelling, sentence structure, and punctuation.
O
Use your B33200 to explore the Essential Questions. expository WRITING How did geography shape the lives of the American colonists? Write a summary essay in which you consider how geographic factors shaped the development of life in the colonies, but also how it led to conflict, including conflicts with Great Britain. io<; 29B; 3od
© Social Studies Skills
create and give A PRESENTATION Use presentation software or a poster to create a presentation that illustrates how life in colonial America was influenced and shaped by geography. Use illustrations to show life, population distribution and settlement patterns in the different colonies and colonial regions. ioc;ha,-3oc;3od
© Thinking Like a Historian
creating MODELS You and other settlers arrive in one of the coastal cities of America. Your group decides to form a new town some miles inland. Make a plan for settlement: the number of workers and artisans needed (farmers, carpenters, and so on); a list of tools, food, and supplies to take along; and things to look for in a site. Sketch a map of the site of your town and the town plan. 291
© Visual Literacy
analyzing images This cartoon was drawn by Benjamin Franklin to promote his Albany Plan of Union. How does the cartoon express the need for a government capable of representing all of the colonies? 299

NY
sc

M

UNIT E OR DIE
156 Life in the American Colonies
Assessment
Directions: Write your answers using standard grammar, spelling, sentence structure, and punctuation.
CHECKING FOR UNDERSTANDING
0 Tension between the American colonies and England increased during the colonial period. Write a paragraph describing some of the reasons for this growing distrust.
1A;300
REVIEW THE GUIDING QUESTIONS
0 Explaining Why did the plantation system develop in the Southern Colonies? ub
0 Analyzing How did physical geography influence the population growth of New York City and Philadelphia in the 1600s and 1700s? ha
O
Identifying Cause and Effect Why did the colonists come to resent English trade policies? 29b 0 Identifying What economic theory encouraged European nations to colonize North America? 2A
0 Describing What impact did the First Great Awakening have on religious freedom? 2sb
0 Identifying What were some ways women contributed to society in colonial America? 23E
© Analyzing How did the Proclamation of 1763 help cause the American Revolution? 4A
0 Analyzing How did British economic policies change after the French and Indian War? 4A
CRITICAL THINKING
0 Describing The Middle Colonies had a mix of many different people, giving the region a diverse culture. What ethnic groups came to the Middle Colonies? How did they help improve farming? nc;23o
0 Making Connections The Southern Colonies came to rely on slavery to support their economy. What role did geography play in the spread of slavery in that region?
IOC; 12B
0 Describing Why did both Britain and France want control of the Ohio River valley? What economic activity in the region was important for the French?
0 Assessing What role did immigrants play in the development of a new spirit of independence among the American people? How important is this spirit to the American national identity? 230
0 Evaluating In what way were town meetings important to the development of local government? How might they have helped the growth of representative government? 3A
0 Synthesizing How did the British system of government change in the 1600s? What are some British ideas about government that influenced the attitudes of the colonists? isa
0 Comparing and Contrasting Compare the physical characteristics of New England with those of the Middle Colonies. What characteristics led New England to develop more industry and larger cities?
11A;29B
0 Analyzing Why do you think many Puritans, Quakers, and Mennonites condemned slavery? What were the conditions of slavery that led them to this conclusion?
230;29B
0 Applying Relative Chronology What were the key events of the French and Indian War? Sequence the events chronologically to show how the war unfolded.
1B;29B
0 Describing The First Great Awakening inspired independence of thought. How did it contribute to the growth of representative government? 3c: 230
0 Analyzing The Tidewater had many large plantations.
Where is the Tidewater located? What natural features
of the environment drew planters to the Tidewater? iia
0 Analyzing How did the physical characteristics of South Carolina and Georgia help make rice a major cash crop? ha
Need Extra Help?
IfYou've Missed Question	O	G	G	O	G	G	G	G	G	0	0	0	0	0	0	0	0	0	0	0	0
Review Lesson	2,4	1	1	1,4	2	3	3	4	4	1	1	4	1	2	2	1	1	4	3	1	1
157
Assessment (continued)
SHORT RESPONSE
PRIM ARY SOURCE
"It is proposed that humble application be made for an act of Parliament of Great Britain, by virtue of which one general government may be formed in America, including all the said colonies, within and under which government each colony may retain its present constitution."
—from the Albany Plan of Union, 1754
© Specifying What was being proposed in the Albany Plan of Union?
© Drawing Inferences How would the resulting government have affected the individual colonies?
29B
EXTENDED RESPONSE
© Expository Writing Benjamin Franklin believed in the ideal of civic virtue, that is, the democratic ideas, practices, and values of a free society. Write an essay evaluating his contribution to this ideal. Give examples of the roles he played, his beliefs, and his participation in public life. 2ob;3od
STANDARDIZED TEST PRACTICE
ANALYZING DOCUMENTS
© Regions This map illustrates trade and industry in the American colonies around 1750. Based on the map, what trade and industry was found only in the Southern Colonies?
10A;29C
A.	lumber
B.	fur and skins
C.	rice and indigo
D.	fishing
© Location Near which major city were there ironworks?
10A;29C
F.
Philadelphia G.
Richmond H.
Williamsburg I.
Savannah Need Extra Help?
Source: Historical Atlas of the United States
IfYou've Missed Question	©	©	©	©	©
Review Lesson	4	4	3		
158 Life in the American Colonies
The Spirit of Independence
networks
There's More Online about the events that drove the colonists and the British apart.
'■ !■
1763-1776
... 4®
SSENTIAL QUESTIONS
• Why does conflict develop? Wiat motivates people to act? 
hi
CHAPTERO
Lesson 1
No Taxation Without Representation
Lesson 2
Uniting the Colonists
Lesson 3
A
Call to Arms Lesson 4
Declaring Independence
1 bh'-h
P'hfe 111:
The Story
Matters ...
He stands proud and tall, this minuteman, part of a colonial militia. Citizen soldiers like him were the first responders of their time. A call to arms could come day or night. The minutemen were out the door on a minute's notice, ready to protect their communities.
Few would doubt the minutemen's bravery. But if the growing tension between the colonies and Great Britain led to war, how would these farmers, clerks, and shopkeepers stand up to a force of skilled British soldiers?
Foldables
Goto the Foldables® library in the back of your book to make a Foldable® that will help you take notes while reading this chapter.
◄ This portrait of a minuteman was created in 1876 to celebrate 100 years of American independence.
©Bettmann/Corbis
1 Unrest 0	Revolution	Declaration of Independence
0,		
O'		

159

CHAPTER 6
Place and Time: The British Colonies n«3 to n?6
The British colonies extended along the coast of the Atlantic Ocean. In the middle of this strip was Philadelphia. This city would become a gathering place for colonial leaders as they discussed the growing conflict with Great Britain.
Step Into the Place
MAP FOCUS
By 1775, British policies had caused unrest in the colonies and a growing movement toward independence. REGIONS
Which colonial region appears to have the largest area of Loyalist support? LOCATION
What lay beyond the borders of British territory in North America?
Making Connections In which colonies do you think the movement for independence might have been the strongest? What makes you think so?
PACIFIC OCEAN
140°W
|	| British territory
|	| Strong Patriot areas in 1775
1 Strong Loyalist areas in 1775
ur Site of major protests against British tax laws, 1764-1774
1 Spanish Missions
NATIVE AMERICAN GROUP
0	200 miles
I---n-H------1
0	200 km
Lambert Azimuthal Equal-Area projection
> i
i
. J
ncrw
Step Into the Time
TIMELINE
Review the time line. What was taking place in Europe at about the same time the First Continental Congress 1763 Treaty of Paris signed
1765 Colonists protest Stamp Act
WORLD EVENT

networks eT MAP Explore the interactive version of
There's More Online!	this map on
NETWORKS.
Ef TIMELINE Explore the interactive version of this time line on NETWORKS.
*
-■ Of V'	\
				1775 Battles of Lexington
			1774 First	and Concord occur
	1770 Boston	1773 Boston Tea	Continental	1776 Colonies issue the
	Massacre occurs	Party takes place	Congress meets	Declaration of Independence
				

1


networks
1
i
5
British Policies
eT MAP The Proclamation of 1763 '
eT self-check quiz eT video
There's More Online!
ef GAME Fill in the Blank Ef graphic organizer
Lesson 1
No Taxation Without
Representation
*
^1
IAL QUESTION
Why dots conflict dwtlop? 
TEKS
Texas Essential Knowledge and Skills 3A Explain the reasons for the growth of representative government and institutions during the colonial period.
It Matters Because
Conflict between the American colonies and the British government began to deepen in the years after the French and Indian War.

3B Analyze the importance of the Mayflower Compact, the Fundamental Orders of Connecticut, and the Virginia House of Burgesses to the growth of representative government.
4A Analyze causes of the American Revolution, including the Proclamation of 1763, the Intolerable Acts, the Stamp Act, mercantilism, lack of representation in Parliament, and British economic policies following the French and Indian War.
4B Explain the roles played by significant individuals during the American Revolution, including Abigail Adams, John Adams, Wentworth Cheswell, Samuel Adams, Mercy Otis Warren, James Armistead, Benjamin Franklin, Bernardo de Galvez, Crispus Attucks, King George III, Haym Salomon, Patrick Henry, Thomas Jefferson, the Marquis de Lafayette, Thomas Paine, and George Washington.
23E Identify the political, social, and economic contributions of women to American society.
Reading HELPDESK
Dealing with Great Britain
guidingquestion Why did the British go vernment establish new policies?
After their victory in the French and Indian War, the British controlled much of North America. To manage this territory, King George III issued the Proclamation of 1763. This order prohibited, or barred, colonists from living west ofthe Appalachian Mountains, on Native American land.
The British believed the Proclamation would help keep peace between Native Americans and settlers. It would also keep colonist? near the Atlantic Coast, where British authority was stronger. Finally, it would allow Britain to control westward expansion and the fur trade in the region. The king sent 10,000 troops to the colonies to enforce the Proclamation. The colonists feared that the large number of British troops would interfere with their liberties, and they resented the restriction on settling western land. Britain Restricts Trade
muain needed new revenue, or income, to pay for the tr The British also had large debts from the French and Indian^ The king and Parliament felt the colonists should pay part oft
Taking Notes: Identifying__________________
As you read, identify British policies that affected the colonists. Record each policy in a chart like this one. Then record the colonists' views of each policy. 162	The Spirit of Independence
Content Vocabulary
•	revenue	•	effifly
•	writ of assistance • boycott
•	resolution	•	repeal

costs, so the British government issued new taxes on the colonies. It also enforced old taxes more strictly. To avoid taxes, some colonists resorted to smuggling. This caused British revenues to fall.
In 1763 Britain’s prime minister, George Grenville, set out to stop the smuggling. Parliament passed a law to have accused smugglers tried by royally appointed judges rather than local juries. Grenville knew that American juries often found smugglers innocent. Parliament also empowered customs officers to obtain writs of assistance. These documents allowed the officers to search almost anywhere—shops, warehouses, and even private homes—for smuggled goods.
The Sugar Act
In 1764 Parliament passed the Sugar Act, which lowered the tax on the molasses the colonists imported. Grenville hoped this change would convince the colonists to pay the tax instead of smuggling. The act also allowed officers to seize goods from accused smugglers without going to court.
revenue incoming money from taxes or other sources writ of assistance a court document allowing customs officers to enter any location to search for smuggled goods
Academic Vocabulary prohibit to prevent or forbid
GEOGRAPHY CONNECTION
King George issued the Proclamation of 1763 in the aftermath ofthe French and Indian War.
REGIONS
How did the Proclamation of 1763 attempt to protect Native American rights and lands? CRITICAL THINKING
Speculating How do you think the colonists reacted to the proclamation?
Lesson 1 163
A GROWING DEBT
USING MATH SKILLS
Did British or colonial subjects pay more toward the debt? What was the difference in pounds and shillings?
CRITICAL THINKING
Identifying Central Issues How did residents of Britain and the American colonists pay their shares of the debt?
Share of the debt per person:
Britain:
@ = 1 British pound (§> = 1 British shilling 1 Pound (£) = 20 Shillings 
Great Britain's national debt soared as a result of the French and Indian War. Subjects living in Great Britain paid more on this debt per person than people living in the colonies. British efforts to get colonists to pay a bigger share of war-related debt led to sharp conflict.

Source: Don Cook, The Long Fuse: How England Lost the American Colonies, 1760-1785
...- ... ‘ '
The Sugar Act angered many colonists. They believed this and other new laws violated their rights. As British citizens, colonists argued, they had a right to a trial by jury and to be viewed as innocent until proved guilty according to British law. Colonists also believed they had the right to be secure in their homes—without the threat of officers barging in to search for smuggled goods.
The colonists also accepted the principle of “no taxation without representation” as a basic right. Since the colonies
; lacked representation in Parliament, many colonists considered it unjust for Parliament to tax the colonies. James Otis, a lawyer in Boston, argued:
PRIMARY SOURCE
M
No parts of [England's colonies] can be taxed without their consent... every part has a right to be represented. W
ill
—from The Rights of the British Colonies, W
PI READING PROGRESS CHECK
Analyzing According to the colonists, what rights did the Sugar Act violate’
SKILLS PRACTICE________________
Keep a list of academic vocabulary and social studies vocabulary.
Before you share information with classmates, choose some of these words to use.
Reading HELPDESK
New Taxes on the Colonies
G u I d IN G Q u E sti o N How did the American colonists react to British policies?
In 1765 Parliament passed the Stamp Act. This law taxed almost all printed materials. Newspapers, wills, and even playing cards needed a stamp to show that the tax had been paid.
I


resolution an official expression of opinion by a group
effigy a mocking figure representing an unpopular individual
boycott to refuse to buy items in order to show disapproval or force acceptance of one's terms repeal to cancel an act or law
Academic Vocabulary
violate to disregard or go against
164
The Spirit of Independence
Opposition to the Stamp Act
The Stamp Act outraged the colonists. They argued that only their own assemblies could tax them. Patrick Henry, a member of the Virginia House of Burgesses, got the burgesses to take action. The assembly passed a resolution declaring that it had “the only and sole exclusive right and power to lay taxes” on its citizens.
In Boston, Samuel Adams helped start the Sons of Liberty. Its members took to the streets to protest the Stamp Act. Protesters burned effigies (EH •fuh»jeez)—stuffed figures—made to look like unpopular tax collectors.
Colonial leaders decided to work together. In October, delegates from nine colonies met in New York at the Stamp Act Congress. They sent a statement to the king and Parliament declaring that only colonial assemblies could tax the colonists.
People in colonial cities urged merchants to boycott British goods. As the boycott spread, businesses in Britain lost money and demanded Parliament repeal, or cancel, the Stamp Act. In March 1766, Parliament repealed the law. However, it also passed the Declaratory Act, stating that it had the right to tax and make decisions for the colonies “in all cases.”
The Townshend Acts
The Stamp Act taught the British that the colonists would resist internal taxes—those paid inside the colonies. As a result, in 1767 Parliament passed the Townshend Acts to tax imports such as glass, tea, and paper. The tax was paid when the goods arrived— before they were brought inside the colonies.
Protests against the Townshend Acts began immediately.
In towns throughout the colonies, women—some organized as Daughters of Liberty—began boycotts of British goods. Mercy Otis Warren, a leader of the Daughters of Liberty, later wrote pamphlets and poems urging separation from Britain. She also
I wrote plays ridiculing British officials.
H READING PROGRESS CHECK
£ Explaining How did the Daughters of Liberty help the colonial cause?
A
British government official placed this seat or stamp, on certain paper items in the colonies to show that the tax on them had been paid. |Foldable^
[Study Organized
Include this lesson's information in your Foldable®
q; O 0	Unrest	Reu elution	Declaration of Independence
LESSON 1 REVIEW
Review Vocabulary
1.	Write a paragraph about the 1760s in the American colonies. Use these vocabulary words: joa;3od
a. revenue b. resolution	c. effigy
d. boycott	e. repeal
Answer the Guiding Questions
2.	Describing Why did the British limit westward settlement in the Proclamation of 1763? 4A
3.	Using Math Skills On the chart showing colonial debt per person, how much is one British pound worth in shillings? What was the share of debt per colonist in shillings?
Calculate the colonist's share of the debt in pounds. 29C;29H;3oc
4.	Identifying Why did colonists oppose the Stamp Act? 4A
NARRATIVE WRITING
Write a conversation between two colonists who disagree over Britain's taxing the colonies to help pay off its debts from the French and Indian War. 4A;3od Lesson 1 165
It Matters Because
Harsh British actions aimed at controlling the colonies united them instead.

TEKS
Texas Essential Knowledge and Skills__________ * 4A Analyze causes of the American
Revolution, including the Proclamation of 1763, the Intolerable Acts, the Stamp Act, mercantilism, lack of representation in Parliament, and British economic policies following the French and Indian War.
4B Explain the roles played by significant individuals during the American Revolution, including Abigail Adams, John Adams, Wentworth Cheswell, Samuel Adams, Mercy Otis Warren, James Armistead, Benjamin Franklin, Bernardo de Galvez, Crispus Attucks, King George III, Haym Salomon, Patrick Henry, Thomas Jefferson, the Marquis de Lafayette, Thomas Paine, and George Washington.
20C Analyze reasons for and the impact of selected examples of civil disobedience in U.S. history such as the Boston Tea Party and Henry David Thoreau's refusal to pay a tax.
Reading HELPDESK
Trouble in Massachusetts
gusdsngquestion How did the American colonists react to the Boston Massacre!
Protests continued to flare in the colonies, making British, nervous. In 1768 they sent word to Britain that the colonies were on the brink of rebellion—a rejection of British authority. Parliament sent troops to Boston. As angry colonists jeered, the redcoats set up camp in the center of the city.
For many colonists, this British act went too far. The colonists were already convinced that the British had passed laws that violated colonial rights. Now Britain had sent an army to occupy, or take control of, colonial cities.
To make matters worse, the soldiers in Boston acted rudely. The re coats, who were mostly poor men, earned little pay. Some stole rom local shops and got into fights with colonists. Also, in their o ours, the soldiers competed for jobs that Bostonians wanted. Tension in the Streets
On March 5, 1770, violence erupted. A fight broke out between ome ostonians and soldiers. As British officers tried to calm me crowd, a man shouted, “We did not send for you. We will not have you here. We’ll get rid of you, we’ll drive you away!”

Taking Notes: Describing___________________
As you read, use a diagram like this one to record
how the Intolerable Acts changed life for the colonists.
The Spirit of Independence
Content Vocabulary ________
•	rebellion
•	propaganda
•	committee of correspondence
•	civil disobedience
The angry townspeople surged forward. They began throwing sticks and stones at the soldiers. “Come on, you rascals, you bloody backs, you lobster scoundrels, fire, if you dare,” someone in the crowd shouted.
After one soldier was knocked down, the nervous redcoats did fire. They killed five colonists. According to accounts, Crispus Attucks, a dockworker who was part African and part Native American, became the first casualty of the American Revolution. One Bostonian cried: “Are the inhabitants to be knocked down in the streets? Are they to be murdered ... ?” The colonists called the tragic encounter “the Boston Massacre.”
Spreading the News
Colonial leaders used the killings as propaganda—information designed to influence opinion. Samuel Adams put up posters that described the Boston Massacre as a slaughter of innocent Americans by bloodthirsty redcoats. Paul Revere made an engraving that showed a British officer giving the order to open fire on an orderly crowd.
The Boston Massacre led colonists to call for stronger boycotts of British goods. Troubled by the growing opposition in the colonies, Parliament repealed the Townshend Acts taxes on British imports, except the one on tea. In response, the colonists ended their boycotts, except on tea. Trade with Britain resumed.
Still, some colonists continued to call for resistance to British rule. In 1772 Samuel Adams revived the Boston committee of correspondence, a group used in earlier protests. The group circulated calls for action against Britain. Soon committees of correspondence sprang up throughout the colonies, bringing together protesters opposed to British measures.
H READING PROGRESS CHECK
Explaining How did the Boston Massacre affect relations between the colonists and Britain?
§
E
Q.
u
Crispus Attucks was the first colonist killed by the British in the Boston Massacre.
Crisis in Boston
guidingquestion How did the British government react to the actions of the colonists?
By 1773, the British East India Company was facing financial ruin. To help save the company and protect the British economy, Parliament passed the Tea Act. It gave the British East India Company nearly total control of the market for tea in the colonies.
rebellion open defiance of authority propaganda ideas or information intentionally spread to harm or help a cause
committee of correspondence
an organization that spread political ideas and information through the colonies
Academic Vocabulary
occupy to move into and take control of a place, especially by force
encounter a sudden, often violent clash
Build Vocabulary: Multiple Meaning Words
As a verb, the word encounter means "to come across or meet." As a noun, encounter can mean "a chance meeting" or "a sudden, often violent, meeting between
Lesson 2 167
Colonists angry at the restrictions of the Tea Act staged a dramatic protest. They threw three shiploads of British tea into Boston Harbor.
CRITICAL THINKING
Analyzing Why were American colonists especially angry with the Tea Act?
J
SKILLS PRACTICE
After a class lesson, work with a partner. Take turns retelling the lesson to one another.
II
Reading HELPDESK
The Tea Act also removed some—but not all—of the taxes on tea, making it less expensive for colonists. Yet the colonists remained angry. They did not want to pay any tax, and they did not want to be told what tea they could buy.
Colonial merchants called for a new boycott. Colonists vowed to stop East India Company ships from unloading. 1 he Daughters of Liberty issued a pamphlet declaring that, rather than part with freedom, “We’ll part with our tea.”
A
Tea Party Despite warnings of trouble, the East India Company continued shipping tea to the colonies. Colonists in New York and Philadelphia forced the tea ships to turn back. In 1773 three ships loaded with tea arrived in Boston Harbor. The royal governor ordered that they be unloaded. The Boston Sons of Liberty acted swiftly. At midnight on December 16, colonists dressed as Native Americans boarded the ships and threw 342 chests ot tea overboard. As word of the “Boston Tea Party” spread, colonists gathered to celebrate the bold act. The Boston Tea Party was an

ReadjngStrategy: Identifying Cause and Effect _
*¥¥“»—„9eta to happe„s, an effect.
fig. one Hu!e and on^o^
The Spirit of Independence
civil disobedient
use of nonviolent protestsK
challenge a government0,1
act of civil disobedience, or the refusal to obey laws that are considered unjust.
The Intolerable Acts
When news of the Boston Tea Party reached London, King George III realized that Britain was losing control of the colonies. He declared, “We must either master them or totally leave them to themselves.”
In 1774 Parliament responded by passing a series of laws called the Coercive Acts. Coercive (co.EHR.sihv) describes the forceful pressure used to make someone do something. These laws were meant to punish the colonists for resisting British authority. One Coercive Act applied to all the colonies. It forced the colonies to let British soldiers live among the colonists. Massachusetts, though, received the harshest treatment.
One of the Coercive Acts banned town meetings in Massachusetts. Another closed Boston Harbor until the colonists paid for the ruined tea. This stopped most shipments of food and other supplies to the colony. Parliament was trying to cut Massachusetts off from the other colonies. Instead, the Coercive Acts drew the colonies together. Other colonies sent food and clothing to support Boston.
Following the Coercive Acts, Parliament also passed the Quebec Act. This law created a government for Canada and extended Canada’s territory south all the way to the Ohio River. This action ignored the colonies’ claims to that region.
The colonists believed all of these new laws violated their rights as English citizens. They expressed their feelings about the laws by calling them the Intolerable Acts. Intolerable means
| painful and unbearable.
j
I H READING PROGRESS CHECK
<
I
Analyzing How did the Intolerable Acts affect the residents of J Massachusetts? King George's determination to take a firm stand against the colonies after the Boston Tea Party failed to resolve the growing crisis. In fact, colonial anger grew.
Include this lesson's information in your Foldable®.
j Unrest o: O; 0?	Revolution	Declaration of Independence
LESSON 2 REVIEW -
Review Vocabulary
1.	Explain the significance of the following terms: 3oa
a. rebellion b. propaganda
c.	committee of correspondence
d.	civil disobedience
Answer the Guiding Questions
2.	Sequencing List the events leading up to and following the Boston Massacre in the order that they occurred, ibjzbb
Analyzing How did Samuel Adams and Paul Revere use propaganda to rally colonists after the Boston Massacre? 4B
4.	Explaining How did the British punish the colonists for the Boston Tea Party? 4A
NARRATIVE WRITING
Write an account of the Boston Massacre from the point of view of a British soldier involved in the event. 3od Lesson 2 169

networks
There's More Online!
Ef BIOGRAPHY
Patrick Henry
ef CHART Choosing Sides
eT graphic organizer
Key Actions of the Continental Congress
eT MAP Battles of Lexington
and Concord
Ef self-check quiz Ef video



r /y vr
7f.l£,
fc, \ "r
I’ b


Lesson 3
A
Call to Arms 
QUESTION
Whatmotivatespeopktoatt? TEKS
Texas Essential Knowledgejnd Skjlls________ 1A Identify the major eras and events in U.S. history through 1877, including colonization, revolution, drafting of the Declaration of Independence, creation and ratification of the Constitution, religious revivals such as the Second Great Awakening, early republic, the Age of Jackson, westward expansion, reform movements, sectionalism, Civil War, and Reconstruction, and describe their causes and effects.
4B Explain the roles played by significant individuals during the American Revolution, including Abigail Adams, John Adams, Wentworth Cheswell, Samuel Adams, Mercy Otis Warren, James Armistead, Benjamin Franklin, Bernardo de Galvez, Crispus Attucks, King George III, Haym Salomon, Patrick Henry, Thomas Jefferson, the Marquis de Lafayette, Thomas Paine, and George Washington.
4C Explain the issues surrounding important events of the American Revolution, including declaring independence; writing the Articles of Confederation; fighting the battles of Lexington, Concord, Saratoga, and Yorktown; enduring the winter at Valley Forge; and signing the Treaty of Paris of 1783.
1OA Locate places and regions of importance in the United States during the 17th, 18th, and 19th centuries.
26B Identify examples of American art, music, and literature that reflect society in different eras.
29D Identify points of view from the historical context surrounding an event and the frame of reference which influenced the participants.
IT MATTERS BECAUSE
/As anger toward the British grew, colonists began to consider the possibility of independence?
A
Meeting in Philadelphia guidingquestion What roles did key individuals play in the movement toward independence?
In September 1774, 55 delegates gathered in Philadelphia. They had come to set up a political body that would represent colonists and challenge British control. The delegates called this body the Continental Congress.
Leaders from twelve of the thirteen colonies attended the meeting. Only Georgia did not send a representative. Massachusetts sent fiery Samuel Adams and his lawyer cousin, John Adams. New York sent John Jay, another lawyer. Virginia sent George Washington, as well as Richard Henry Lee and Patrick Henry, two outspoken defenders of colonial rights. Patrick Henry wanted the colonies to unite in firm resistance to Britain. He summed up the meaning of the meeting when he addressed the delegates on its second day:
PRIMARYSOURCE
7^7
Reading HELPDESK
The distinctions between Virginians, Pennsylvanians, New Yorkers, and New Englanders are no more. I am not a Virginian, but an American. 99
—Patrick Henry, at the Continental Congress, 177*
Taking Notes: Summarizing
As you read, use a diagram like this one to list three key actions of the Continental Congress.
Continental Congress
Content Vocabulary
•	minuteman
•	Loyalist
•	Patriot
The Delegates Vote
The delegates discussed complaints against the British. Then they voted. In a statement of grievances, the delegates called for the repeal of 13 acts of Parliament. They believed these laws violated the “laws of nature, the principles of the English constitution, and the several charters” of the colonies. The delegates also voted to boycott British trade. The colonies would not import or use any British goods, nor would they sell their goods in Great Britain.
The delegates to the Continental Congress also decided to endorse the Suffolk Resolves, prepared by the people of Boston and other towns in Suffolk County, Massachusetts. These resolutions declared the Coercive Acts to be illegal. They called on the county’s residents to arm themselves against the British. After delegates endorsed the resolves, other colonies also organized militias—groups of citizen soldiers.
The Colonial Militias
American colonists had a long tradition of serving and protecting their communities with militias. Members of a militia were an important part of each town’s defense. Militia members trained and drilled with the other citizen soldiers. They practiced using muskets and cannons. Each member was required to provide his own weapon—usually a musket—and ammunition. Later, as tension between Britain and the colonies grew, towns began to
■
Build Vocabulary: Multiple Meaning Words _____________________________
The word resolves, as used on this page, means "something that is decided. As a noun, the word resolve can also mean "firmness of purpose," as in "The Patriots showed resolve against the British." As a verb, resolve can mean "to decide something" or "to solve a problem.
Lesson 3 171
Patrick Henry (1736-1799)
Henry was one of the first members of the Virginia House of Burgesses to argue for independence from Britain. His speaking ability inspired many colonists. In a debate over whether the Virginia Colony should form a militia, he said, "Give me liberty or give me death!" His stirring cry gave voice to the independence movement.
Fighting Begins
GUIDINGQUESTION
Why were the battles at Lexington and Concord important? Many colonists believed that if fighting with the British were to break out, it would happen in New England. Militias in Massachusetts held drills, made bullets, and stockpiled weapons. Some militias were known as minutemen because they boasted they would be ready to fight at a minute’s notice. In the winter of 1774-1775, a British officer stationed in Boston noted in his diary.
PRIMARY SOURCE
M
The people are evidently making every preparation for resistance. They are taking every means to provide themselves with Arms. 99 —from Diary of Frederick Mackenzie, 1775
•• CH’TKAi. THINKING
Analyzing Is the ability to speak well an important quality for a leader? Explain.
Great Britain Sends Troops
The British also got ready for a fight. King George told Parliament that the New England Colonies were “in a state of rebellion” and that “blows must decide” who would control America. By April 1775, several thousand British troops were in and around Boston, with more on the way. British general Thomas Gage had orders to seize the weapons from the Massachusetts militia and arrest the leaders.
Gage learned that the militia was storing arms and ammunition at Concord, a town about 20 miles (32 km) northwest of Boston. He ordered 700 troops under Lieutenant Colonel Francis Smith “to Concord, where you will seize and destroy all the artillery and ammunition you can find.”
The British on the Move

I
II
Reading HELPDESK
minuteman during Revolutionary era, a civilian sworn to be ready to fight with only one minute's notice
be Spirit of Independence
On the night of April 18, 1775, colonial protest leader Dr. Joseph Warren walked through Boston. Watching for any unusual activity by the British, he saw troops marching out of the city.
Warren alerted Paul Revere and William Dawes, members of the Sons of Liberty. Revere and Dawes rode to Lexington, a town east of Concord, to spread the word that the British were coming. Revere galloped across the countryside, shouting his warning of the approaching troops. Hearing the news, Samuel Adams said, What a glorious morning this is!” He was ready to fight.
A
British patrol later captured Dawes and Revere. Another rider named Samuel Prescott carried the warning to Concord. View the map to see the locations of Lexington and Concord. SKILLS PRACTICE
As you read, look for connecting words such as and, but, or, because before, after, like, or unlike. Classify them according to the type of ' connection they show, for example: cause, comparison, or sequence.
^7
I
GEOGRAPHY CONNECTION
The first fighting between British troops and the colonial militia took place at Lexington and Concord, Massachusetts.
MOVEMENT
Which towns did Paul Revere warn on his ride to Lexington?
CRITICAL THINKING
Analyzing How might the starting point of the British forces in Boston have affected the outcome of these battles?
i
i
Lexington and Concord
Meanwhile, the British continued their march. At dawn, the redcoats approached Lexington. There they ran into about 70 waiting minutemen. Led by Captain John Parker, the minutemen stood on the town common with muskets in hand. Badly outnumbered, the minutemen were about to give way to the redcoats. Just then, a shot was fired—from where is still not clear. Both sides let loose an exchange of bullets. When the shooting ended, eight minutemen lay dead.
The British continued on to Concord. While some troops burned the few weapons they found, the others met a group of minutemen waiting at the North Bridge. In a short battle, the British took heavy losses. They began to make their way back to Boston.
All along the road, colonists hid behind trees and fired on the soldiers. By the time the redcoats reached Boston, at least 174 were wounded and 73 were dead.
About 60 years later, poet Ralph Waldo Emerson wrote in “The Concord Hymn” that the Americans at Lexington and Concord had fired the “shot heard ‘round the world. The battle for independence had begun.
H READING PROGRESS CHECK
Explaining Why did British troops march to Concord?
Academic Vocabulary_____________
approach to draw near to something
SKILLS PRACTICE_____________________________________________
Work with a group. Before you read, look at the pictures, maps, graphs, charts, and bold-faced words in your text. Ask group members to tell you what they know about a topic, and tell them what you know.
I
Lesson 3 173

Reading HELPDESK
This painting shows the British charge at what historians call the Battle of Bunker Hill—which actually took place on Breed's Hill.
More Military Action
guiding question What were the beliefs of the Loyalists and Patriots?
After the battles at Lexington and Concord, armed conflict with British forces quickly spread. Benedict Arnold, a captain in the Connecticut militia, raised a force of 400 to seize Fort Ticonderoga near Lake Champlain in New York. Ticonderoga occupied a key location. It was also rich in military supplies. Arnold learned that Ethan Allen of nearby Vermont also planned to attack the fort, so he joined forces with Allen’s men—the so-called Green Mountain Boys. Together, they took the British by surprise. Fort Ticonderoga surrendered on May 10, 1775.
Later, Arnold became a traitor to the Patriot cause. He sold military information to the British. When his crime was discovered in September 1780, he fled to British-controlled New York City. There he commanded British troops and led raids against the Americans in Virginia and Connecticut.
The Battle of Bunker Hill
Following Lexington and Concord, more volunteers joined the colonial militias. Soon militias around Boston numbered about 20,000 strong.
The British remained in control of the city, with the militia camped nearby. On June 16, 1775, militia commanded by Colonel William Prescott set up posts on Bunker Hill and Breed’s Hill, across the harbor from Boston.

Loyalist an American colonist who remained loyal to Britain and opposed the war for independence Patriot an American colonist who favored American independence
Academic Vocabulary
so-called known as
174 The Spirit of Independence
The next day, the redcoats assembled at Breed’s Hill. Bayonets drawn, they charged. Low on ammunition, Prescott reportedly ordered, “Don’t fire until you see the whites of their eyes.” The Americans opened fire, forcing the British to retreat. Twice more the redcoats charged, receiving furious fire from above. Finally, the Americans ran out of gunpowder and had to withdraw.
The battle on Breed’s Hill—which became known as the Battle of Bunker Hill—was a British victory. Yet the British suffered heavy losses of more than 1,000 dead and wounded. They were learning that defeating the Americans on the battlefield would be neither quick nor easy.
Choosing Sides
As news of these battles spread, each colonist faced a major decision—to join the rebels or remain loyal to Great Britain.
Those who sided with Britain, the Loyalists, did not think unfair taxes and laws justified a rebellion. Some were officeholders who felt a responsibility to uphold British rule. Others had not suffered from British policies and saw no reason to break with Britain. Still others believed Britain would win the war and did not want to be on the losing side.
The Patriots, on the other hand, supported the war. They believed that the colonists should have the right to govern themselves. The Patriots were determined to fight the British until American independence was won.
The American Revolution was not just a war between America and Britain. It was also a civil war—Patriots against Loyalists.
H READING PROGRESS CHECK
Describing What did the British learn from the Battle of Bunker Hill?
Making Predictions
Loyalists came from all parts of American society. Political differences divided communities and even split families. Benjamin Franklin’s son, William, served as Royal Governor of New Jersey.
When the Revolution began, William remained loyal to Britain and quarreled with his father. Do you think Benjamin Franklin and William Franklin resolved their differences?
FoLDABLES
Study Organizer]
Include this lesson's information in your Foldable®.
i Unrest o'; 0 OS . 	Revolution	■Declaration of Independence
LESSON 3 REVIEW -
Review Vocabulary
1.	Write a paragraph explaining what the words below have in common. 3oa;3od
a. minuteman b. Loyalist c. Patriot
Answer the Guiding Questions
2.	Drawing Conclusions How did the Continental Congress's support for the Suffolk Resolves push the colonies closer to war? ia,-29b
3.	Explaining Why did the Continental Congress vote in 1774 to repeal the Coercive Acts passed by Parliament? 4B;29d
4.	Interpreting Reread Patrick Henry's quote about the Continental Congress. What change was taking place in how the colonists saw themselves? 290
NARRATIVE WRITING
Write a scene from a play in which colonists in a small town react to the news of the battles at Lexington and Concord. Remember, not all colonists wanted independence from Britain. 290,300 Lesson 3 175
What Do You
Think?
Should the Colonies Declare Their Independence From Great Britain?
Some Americans did not think that independence was the right path for the colonies. They wanted to remain under British rule. These colonists were called Loyalists. Colonists who believed the colonies should become an independent nation were called Patriots.
In these excerpts, Patriot Thomas Paine and Loyalist Charles Inglis express different points of view about the fight for American Independence.
Yes
ssas
** Volumes have been written on the subject of the struggle between England and America... and the period of debate is closed....
... I challenge the warmest advocate for reconciliation to show a single advantage that this continent can reap by being connected with Great Britain.
But the injuries and disadvantages... are without number; and our duty to mankind at large, as well as to ourselves, instruct us to renounce the alliance.
... Every thing that is right or reasonable pleads for separation. The blood of the slain, the weeping voice of nature cries, 'TIS TIME TO PART. 99
THOMAS PAINE
„ Tension between
1 British authorities and the colonists grew during the 1770s.

WiM

H
a * s
„ w-


'•s??
Not every colonist agreed with the behavior of the protesters involved with the Boston Tea Party.
Vocabulary
CHARLES INGLIS

PRIMARY SOURCE
tt I think it no difficult matter to point out
many advantages which will certainly attend our
reconciliation and connection with Great-Britain.... The blood of the slain, the weeping voice of nature cries—ft is time to be reconciled; it is time to lay aside those animosities which have pushed on Britons to shed the blood of Britons...	____
A
Declaration of Independency would infallibly disunite and divide the colonists.... ... Torrents of blood will be spilt, and thousands reduced to beggary and wretchedness....
America is far from being yet in a desperate situation. I am confident she may obtain honourable and advantageous terms from Great-Britain. 99
—Charles Inglis, The True Interest of America Impartially Stated, 1776
advocate
supporter
reconciliation
settlement, understanding
renounce
to give up, to abandon
animosity
hostility, ill will, hatred
infallibly
without fail
torrent
fast-moving liquid
WhatDoYou Think? DBQ
O
Drawing Inferences Both of these passages were written in 1776, the same year that the Declaration of Independence was adopted. How do you think Paine and Inglis reacted to the colonies' breaking away from Britain? 4B;29B 0 Identifying Bias Do either Paine or Inglis use emotional or biased language? Cite examples. 29F
0 Evaluating In your opinion, which of the two writers makes the stronger argument? Explain your answer. 2»e
I : i

Lesson 3	17
©
vh
networks	E"
There's More Online!	K j
Ef biography	K
Thomas Paine	H|
Ef graphic organizer
Dedarationof
independence
eT map The Siege of Boston
Ef primary source
•	Battles of Lexington and Concord
•	Reaction to Declaration of Independence
sf self-check quiz
SLIDESHOW
The Committee of Five
& VIDEO
COMMON SENSE; | INHABITANTS
o r
AMERICA,!
Oa ik»
SUBJECT#.
Lesson 4
Declaring Independence
L QUESTION
TEKS
Texas Essential Knowledge and Skills__________ 1A Identify the major eras and events in U.S. history through 1877, including colonization, revolution, drafting of the Declaration of Independence, creation and ratification of the Constitution, religious revivals such as the Second Great Awakening, early republic, the Age of Jackson, westward expansion, reform movements, sectionalism, Civil War, and Reconstruction, and describe their causes and effects.
1C Explain the significance of the following dates: 1607, founding of Jamestown; 1620, arrival of the Pilgrims and signing of the Mayflower Compact; 1776, adoption of the Declaration of Independence; 1787, writing of the U.S. Constitution; 1803, Louisiana Purchase; and 1861-1865, Civil War.
4A Analyze causes of the American Revolution, including the Proclamation of 1763, the Intolerable Acts, the Stamp Act, mercantilism, lack of representation in Parliament, and British economic policies following the French and Indian War.
4C Explain the issues surrounding important events of the American Revolution, including declaring independence; writing the Articles of Confederation; fighting the battles of Lexington, Concord, Saratoga, and Yorktown; enduring the winter at Valley Forge; and signing the Treaty of Paris of 1783.
IT MATTERS BECAUSE
The decision to declare independence came only after all other options had been exhausted.
The Second Continental Congress
GUiDlNGQUESTlON Howdid individuals and events impact efforts for independence?
In 1774 the Continental Congress agreed to meet again it the British did not address their complaints. In fact, as the battles at Lexington and Concord in 1775 showed, the dispute between the British and the colonies had worsened.
Distinguished Leaders
The Second Continental Congress met on May 10, 1775. The delegates included some of the greatest leaders in the colonies. Among them were John and Samuel Adams, Patrick Henry, Richard Henry Lee, and George Washington—all delegates to the First Continental Congress. Several new delegates came as well.
Benjamin Franklin, one of the most respected men in the colonies, had been a leader in the Pennsylvania legislature. In 1765 he represented the colonies in London and helped win repeal of the Stamp Act. John Hancock of Massachusetts was a wealthy merchant. He funded many Patriot groups, including the Sons of Liberty. The delegates chose Hancock to be president of the Second Continental Congress. Thomas Jefferson, only 32, was also a delegate. He served in the Virginia legislature. Jefferson was already known as a brilliant thinker and writer.

Reading HELPDESK

Taking Notes: Organizing_________________
As you read, use a diagram like this one to describe the parts of the Declaration of Independence.
Declaration of Independence
Part 1:
T
Part 2: 1 ,	— 				
1 Part 3:		1
f Part 4:		~	1
Content Vocabulary
•	petition
•	preamble
The Spirit of Independence
The delegates at the Second Continental Congress had much to discuss. Though American and British blood had been spilled, they were not ready to vote for a break from Britain. It would be another year before Jefferson would write the Declaration of Independence.
Key Actions
The Continental Congress did take steps to begin governing the colonies. It authorized the printing of money and set up a post office, with Franklin in charge. The Congress also formed committees to handle relations with Native Americans and foreign countries. Most important, it created the Continental Army.
Unlike local militias, such a force could form and carry out an overall strategy for fighting the British. The Congress unanimously chose George Washington to command this army. Washington was an experienced soldier and a respected Southern planter. He left Philadelphia at once to take charge of the forces in Boston.
The delegates then offered Britain a last chance to avoid war. They sent a petition, or formal request, to George III.
Called the Olive Branch Petition, it assured the king that the colonists wanted peace. It asked him to protect the colonists’ rights. The king rejected the petition. Instead, he prepared for war. He hired more than 30,000 German troops, called Hessians (HEH»shuhnz), to fight alongside British troops.
15C Identify colonial grievances listed in the Declaration of Independence and explain how those grievances were addressed in the U.S. Constitution and the Bill of Rights.
19A Define and give examples of unalienable rights. 20A Explain the role of significant individuals such as Thomas Hooker, Charles de Montesquieu, John Locke, William Blackstone, and William Penn in the development of self-government in colonial America.
29D Identify points of view from the historical context surrounding an event and the frame of reference which influenced the participants.
petition a formal request
GEOGRAPHY CONNECTION
When Washington placed troops on Dorchester Heights in March 1776, British forces left Boston.
MOVEMENT
In which direction did British forces retreat? CRITICAL THINKING
Analyzing Visuals Why would British General Howe have been concerned about Patriot cannons on Nook's Hill?
Lesson 4 179
General George Washington commanded the Continental Army in their battles with the British.
i!
Thomas Paine's Common Sense had a great influence on public opinion in the colonies.
■
'•
COMMON SENSE* INHABITANTS
o F
A M E R
r c a, Oo the	tetenSfog
E c T S.
.. Smt
c~. ,;f
s v a
The War Heats Up
Congress learned that British troops in Canada were planning to invade New York. The Americans decided to strike first. A unit of Patriots marched north from Fort Ticonderoga and captured Montreal. However, an American attack on Quebec, led by Benedict Arnold, failed.
Washington reached the Boston area in July 1775, a few weeks after the Battle of Bunker Hill. The British held Boston, but Patriot militia ringed the city. Although the size of the colonial force grew every day, Washington realized that the men were disorganized and lacked discipline—the ability to follow strict rules and procedures. Washington began the task of turning armed civilians into soldiers.
Washington also needed weapons. He arranged to have dozens of cannons hauled 300 miles (483 km) from Fort Ticonderoga. Moving the heavy guns was a huge effort.
In March 1776, Washington believed his army was ready to fight. Under the cover of darkness, he moved soldiers and cannons into position overlooking Boston, while the redcoats slept.
The move surprised the British, who realized they were now within easy reach of Washington’s big guns. British General William Howe commanded his soldiers to hoard ships and withdraw from Boston. On March 17, Washington led his jubilant troops into the city. They watched as the British troops sailed away to Halifax, Nova Scotia, a part of Canada.
Moving Toward Independence
Many colonists held on to hope that the colonies could remain part of Great Britain. Still, support for independence was growing It was inspired in no small part by writer Thomas Paine. Paine arrived in the colonies from England in 1774. He soon caught the revolutionary spirit. In January 1776, he published a pamphlet called Common Sense. In bold language, Paine called for a complete break with British rule.
PRIMARY SOURCE
Reading HELPDESK

& Every thing that is right or reasonable pleads for separation. The blood of the slain, the weeping voice of nature cries, 'TIS TIME TO PART. 99
—from Common Sense, W

Academic Vocabulary
discipline the ability to follow strict rules and procedures debate a discussion of opposing points of view
180 The Spirit of Independence
Common Sense listed powerful reasons why Americans would be better off free from Great Britain. The pamphlet greatly influenced opinions throughout the colonies.
H READING PROGRESS CHECK
Explaining What was the significance of the Olive Branch Petition?
Declaring Independence
guidingquestion Why did the American colonies declare independence?
The Second Continental Congress was filled with spirited debate: Should the colonies declare themselves an independent nation or stay under British rule? In June 1776, Virginias Richard Henry Lee offered a bold resolution:
PRIMARY SOURCE
« That these United Colonies are, and of right ought to be, free and independent States ... and that all political connection between them and the State of Great Britain is, and ought to be, totally dissolved. 99
—Richard Henry Lee, resolution for independence, 1776
The Congress debated Lee’s resolution. Some delegates still thought the colonies should not form a separate nation. Others argued that war had already begun and they should be free from Great Britain. Still others feared Britain’s power to crush the rebellion.
Writing the Declaration
While delegates debated, Congress chose a committee to write a declaration of independence.
John Adams, Benjamin Franklin, Thomas Jefferson, Robert Livingston, and Roger Sherman formed the committee. Adams asked Jefferson to write the first draft. Jefferson hesitated, but Adams persuaded him, saying:
Committee members Benjamin Franklin, John Adams, and Thomas Jefferson examine Jefferson's changes to his draft of the Declaration.
4-
PRIMARY SOURCE
M
Reason first—You are a Virginian, and a Virginian ought to appear at the head of this business. Reason second—I am obnoxious, suspected, and unpopular. You are very much otherwise. Reason third—you can write ten times better than I can. 99 —from The Writings of Thomas Jefferson, 1822
Jefferson agreed that he would do the writing for the great project. He drew on ideas from English philosopher John Locke to explain why the thirteen colonies were proclaiming their freedom.
r j


Jefferson and the rest of the committee present the completed Declaration of Independence to the Second Continental Congress.
preamble the introduction to a formal document that often tells why the document was written
In the 1690s Locke had expressed the idea that people are born with certain natural rights to life, liberty, and property. Locke wrote that people form
governments to protect those rights and that a
government interfering with those rights could rightfully be overthrown. Jefferson and other Patriots agreed with Locke. On July 2, 1776, the Second
Continental Congress voted on Lee’s resolution for independence. Twelve colonies voted for independence. New York did not vote but later announced its support.
Next, the delegates discussed Jefferson’s draft ol the Declaration of Independence. After making some changes, delegates approved the document on July 4, 1776. John Hancock signed the Declaration first. He remarked that he wrote his name large enough for King George to read without his glasses. Eventually, 56 delegates signed the document announcing the birth of the United States.
Copies of the Declaration of Independence were printed and sent out to people in the newly declared independent states. George Washington had the Declaration read to his troops in New York City on July 9. In Worcester, Massachusetts, a public reading of the Declaration of Independence led to “repeated [cheers], firing of musketry and cannon, bonfires, and other demonstrations of joy.”
The Declaration of Independence
The Declaration has four major sections. The preamble, or introduction, states that people who wish to form a new country should explain their reasons for doing so. The next two sections of the Declaration list the rights that the colonists believed they should have and their complaints against Great Britain. The final section proclaims the existence of the new nation.
John Adams expected the day Congress voted on Lee’s resolution for independence to be celebrated as a national
Academic Vocabulary
status rank or place as compared
to others
Reading HELPDESK
Tie Spirit of Independence
holiday. He wrote, “The Second Day of July 1776 ... ought to be solemnized with Pomp and Parade ... and Illuminations from one End of this Continent to the other.” Instead, July 4, the date the delegates actually adopted the Declaration of Independence, is celebrated as Independence Day.
The Declaration of Independence states what Jefferson and many Americans thought were universal principles—that is, principles that apply to all people in all situations. It begins by describing what had long been viewed as basic English rights:
PRIMARY SOURCE
M
We hold these truths to be self-evident, that all men are created equal, that they are endowed by their Creator with certain unalienable [not to be denied] Rights, that among these are Life, Liberty, and the pursuit of Happiness.» —Declaration of Independence, 1776
The Declaration states that government exists to protect these rights. If government fails, “it is the Right of the People to alter or to abolish it and to institute new Government.” The document goes on to list grievances against the king and Parliament. These include “cutting off our trade with all parts of the world” and “imposing taxes on us without our consent.” Americans had “Petitioned for Redress” of these grievances. The British had ignored or rejected these petitions.
Finally, the Declaration announces America’s new status (STAY»tuhs). Pledging “to each other our Lives, our Fortunes, and our sacred Honor,” the Americans declared themselves a new nation. The struggle for independence—the American Revolution—had begun.
H READING PROGRESS CHECK
Summarizing According to John Locke, what is the purpose of government?
LESSON 4 REVIEW
Review Vocabulary
1.	Use the term petition in a sentence about the colonists' struggles with Britain. 3oa;3ob
2.	Use preamble in a sentence that helps explain its meaning. 3oa;3ob
Answer the Guiding Questions
3.	Describing What were the political contributions of Thomas Jefferson and Richard Henry Lee? 22B
SKILLS PRACTICE_______________
Before you read a section of text, use the visuals, bold-faced terms, and headings to make predictions about content. When you come to these features as you read, check to see if your predictions are correct.
FoLDABLES
Study Organizer]
Include this lesson's information in your Foldable®
o| 0 0;	Revolution	Declaration of Independence
Lesson 4 183
4.	Explaining What is the significance ofthe year 1776 in the nation's history? 15c
5.	Identifying Who was chosen to write the first draft of the Declaration of Independence? If the government does not protect the basic rights ofthe people it governs, what did the Declaration say that people have the right to do? 300
PERSUASIVE WRITING
Who did the most to promote the cause of independence: George Washington, Thomas Jefferson, or Thomas Paine? Give reasons for your choice. 4B;30D
Activities
Directions: Write your answers using standard grammar, spelling, sentence structure, and punctuation.
O
Use your OE32I03 to explore the Essential Questions. EXPOSITORY WRITING
Explain the issues and events leading up to the Declaration of Independence. Use examples from the chapter to support your answer, isc,- 3od Social Studies Skills IDENTIFYING BIAS Analyze this poster, which was created after the Boston Massacre. Create an alternative version that describes the event from the British point of view. Write a brief explanation of how your poster differs from the one shown here. Ask what words or images in your poster show bias. 29f,-3od
AMERICANS' scab in Remembrance the HORRID MASSACRE'
Perpetrated in King*fttcet. Boston. New- England.
On the Evening of March the Fifth, 1770.
When five of your fellow countrymen, Gray, Maverick, Caldwell. Attucks, and Carr.
Lay Wallowing in their Gore ’
Being bvfety, and moft inhumanly MURDERED’
An/I <UV xx.t -	•	’•
© Thinking Like a Historian
DRAWING CONCLUSIONS
What three unalienable rights are identified in the Declaration of Independence? What happens when one person's actions infringe on another person's unalienable rights? Write your response in a paragraph. 29B; 3od © Visual Literacy
INTERPRETING IMAGES
This 1774 cartoon shows Patriots pouring tea down the throat of a British tax collector. What clues help you identify the time period or era of the cartoon? How do the Patriots seem to feel toward the tax collector? What reaction would a Loyalist have on seeing the cartoon? 290 
■ftf.
- ^-^7
Spirit of Independence

Assessment
Directions: Write your answers using standard grammar, spelling, sentence structure, and punctuation.
CHECKING FOR UNDERSTANDING
© Explain the role that each of the following individuals played during the American Revolution. 4B
A.
John Adams B.
Benjamin Franklin C.
Crispus Attucks D.
King George III E.
Thomas Jefferson F.
Thomas Paine REVIEW THE GUIDING QUESTIONS
© Explaining How did women such as Mercy Otis Warren encourage colonists to oppose Britain's policies? 4b
CRITICAL THINKING
© Analyzing Describe in your own words what "No taxation without representation" means. How did the issue of representation contribute to the start of the American Revolution? ia,-4a
© Identifying Ifgovernment does not protect the basic rights of the people, what did the Declaration of Independence say that people had the right to do?
© Analyzing Why did the Tea Act anger the colonists? How did the colonists show their anger? iauoc
i!
© Analyzing What was the Stamp Act? How did it contribute to the start of the American Revolution?
4A
© Drawing Inferences What factors led to the Boston Tea Party? How did this incident represent an act of civil disobedience? 20c; 29b
© Analyzing What part did the Intolerable Acts play in bringing about the American Revolution? 4A
© Explaining Why did British troops march on the towns of Lexington and Concord? How do these events mark the start of the American Revolution?
4(
© Explaining What happened at Concord in April 1775 and why was it significant? 4c
© Identifying Points of View Richard Henry Lee's resolution called for the colonists to form a separate nation. Why did some members of Congress hesitate to declare independence? ia;29d
© Describing Why did the Second Continental
Congress draft the Declaration of Independence? ia
© Identifying What policies of King George III did the colonists condemn in the Declaration of Independence? Identify at least three of their grievances, isc
© Making Connections Read the "Declaration of Natural Rights" in the Declaration of Independence. Select what you think is the most important idea and explain in a paragraph how this idea affects your life today. 300
© Drawing Inferences The Declaration of Independence lists many complaints against King George III. One states that the king prevents the colonists from trading "with all parts of the world." Why was the opportunity to trade voluntarily with other nations important to the colonists?
4B;29B
© Speculating What role did Benedict Arnold play in the battle of Fort Ticonderoga? Why do you think he later became a traitor to the Patriot cause? 290
© Interpreting Why do you think the poet Ralph Waldo Emerson described the Americans at Lexington and Concord as having fired the"shot heard 'round the world"?
© Drawing Conclusions What was the Olive Branch Petition? How did King George react to it? Did his reaction move the colonists farther away from or closer to declaring independence? Explain. 29B
© Evaluating Sources Based on Language Many selections are written with a specific audience in mind. Review the writings of Thomas Paine and Charles Inglis in the chapter feature. What are the authors'motives? Are they writing for a specific audience: King George and Parliament? Patriots, Loyalists, or others? 29c
i
j
I
Need Extra Help?
IfYou've Missed Question	O	©	0	©	©	©	©	©	©	©	©	©	©	©	©	©	©	©	©
Review Lesson	1,2,3,4	1	1	2	2	3	3	4	4	4	1	4	2	4	4	3	3	4	3
185
? « Assessment (continued)
DBQ
SHORT RESPONSE
British writer Samuel Johnson said in his 1775 pamphlet, Taxation No Tyranny.
PRIMARY SOURCE
"He who goes voluntarily to America, cannot complain of losing what he leaves in Europe.... By his own choice he has left a country wheie he had a vote and little property, for another where he has great property, hut no cote.
—The Works of Samuel Johnson
© Speculating How might colonists respond to Johnson's statement? 290 © Interpreting What complaint does Johnson's statement appear to address? 4A
EXTENDED RESPONSE
© Descriptive Writing It is 1774, and you are visiting the colonies from a country other than Great Britain. In a letter to a friend who lives in your home country, write about the Boston Tea Party and the British response. Describe the mood of the colonists and predict what will happen next. Are the colonists angry or fearful? Is armed conflict sure to come? 20c, 2»d; jod
STANDARDIZED TEST PRACTICE
ANALYZING DOCUMENTS
DBQ
© Drawing Conclusions According to the map, the battles at Lexington and Concord were fought 29B;29c
A.	three days apart.
B.	at the same location.
C.	on the same day.
D.	in New York.
© Identifying Based on the map, who traveled in a southeasterly direction to the battle at Concord? 29c
F.
Loyalists G.
British troops H.	colonial messengers
I.	colonial troops
Need Extra Help?
If You've Missed Question	©	©	©	©	©
Review Lesson	1	1	3	3	3
186 The Spirit of Independence
The Declaration of independence
In Congress, July 4,1776. The unanimous Declaration of the thirteen United States of America,
[Preamble]
When in the Course of human events, it becomes necessary for one people to dissolve the political bands which have connected them with another, and to assume among the Powers of the earth, the separate and equal station to which the Laws of Nature and of Nature s God entitle them, a decent respect to the opinions of mankind requires that they should declare the causes which impel them to the separation.
[Declaration of Natural Rights]
We hold these truths to be self-evident, that all men are created equal, that they are endowed by their Creator with certain unalienable Rights, that among these are Life, Liberty, and the pursuit of Happiness.
That to secure these rights, Governments are instituted among Men, deriving their just powers from the consent of the governed,
That whenever any Form of Government becomes destructive of these ends, it is the Right of the People to alter or to abolish it, and to institute new Government, laying its foundation on such principles and organizing its powers in such form, as to them shall seem most likely to effect their Safety and Happiness. Prudence, indeed, will dictate that Governments long established should not be changed for light and transient causes; and accordingly all experience hath shown, that mankind are more disposed to suffer, while evils are sufferable, than to right themselves by abolishing the forms to which they are accustomed. But when a long train of abuses and usurpations, pursuing invariably the same Object evinces a design to reduce them under absolute Despotism, it is their right, it is their duty, to throw off such Government, and to provide new Guards for their future security.
[List of Grievances]
Such has been the patient sufferance of these Colonies; and such is now the necessity which constrains them to alter their former Systems of Government. The history of the present King of Great Britain is a history of repeated injuries and usurpations, all having in direct object the establishment of an absolute Tyranny over these States. To prove this, let Facts be submitted to a candid world.
Words are spelled as originally written.
The Preamble The Declaration of Independence has four parts. The Preamble explains why the Continental Congress drew up the Declaration.
Natural Rights The second part, the Declaration of Natural Rights, lists the rights of the citizens. It goes on to explain that, in a republic, people form a government to protect their rights.

impel: force
endowed: provided
usurpations: unjust uses of power
despotism: unlimited power
List of Grievances The third part of the Declaration lists the colonists'complaints against the British government. Notice that King George III is singled out for blame.
The Declaration of Independence 187
relinquish: give up inestimable: priceless
He has refused his Assent to Laws, the most wholesome and necessary for the public good.
He has forbidden his Governors to pass Laws of immediate and pressing importance, unless suspended in their operation till his Assent should be obtained; and when so suspended, he has utterly neglected to attend to them.
He has refused to pass other Laws for the accommodation of large districts of people, unless those people would relinquish the right of Representation in the Legislature, a right inestimable to them and formidable to tyrants only.
He has called together legislative bodies at places unusual, uncomfortable, and distant from the depository of their Public Records, for the sole purpose of fatiguing them into compliance with his measures.
He has dissolved Representative Houses repeatedly, for opposing with manly firmness his invasions on the rights of the people.
He has refused for a long time, after such dissolutions, to cause others to be elected; whereby the Legislative Powers, incapable of Annihilation, have returned to the People at large for their exercise; the State remaining in the mean time exposed to all the dangers of invasion from without, and convulsions within.
He has endeavoured to prevent the population of these States; for that purpose obstructing the Laws for Naturalization of Foreigners; refusing to pass others to encourage their migrations hither, and raising the conditions of new Appropriations of Lands.
He has obstructed the Administration of Justice, by refusing his Assent to Laws for establishing Judiciary Powers.
He has made Judges dependent on his Will alone, for the tenure of their offices, and the amount and payment of their salaries.
He has erected a multitude of New Offices, and sent hither swarms of Officers to harass our people, and eat out their
He has kept among us, in times of peace, Standing Armies without the Consent of our legislature.
He has affected to render the Military independent of and superior to the Civil Power.
He has combined with others to subject us to a jurisdiction foreign to our constitution, and unacknowledged by our laws; giving his Assent to their acts of pretended legislation: For quartering large bodies of troops among us:

For protecting them, by a mock Trial, from Punishment for any Murders which they should commit on the Inhabitants of these States:
For cutting off our Trade with all parts ofthe world:
For imposing taxes on us without our Consent:
For depriving us in many cases, of the benefits of Trial by Jury:
For transporting us beyond Seas to be tried for pretended offences:
For abolishing the free System of English Laws in a neighbouring Province, establishing therein an Arbitrary government, and enlarging its Boundaries so as to render it at once an example and fit instrument for introducing the same absolute rule into these Colonies:
For taking away our Charters, abolishing our most valuable Laws, and altering fundamentally the Forms of our Governments:
For suspending our own Legislature, and declaring themselves invested with Power to legislate for us in all cases whatsoever.
He has abdicated Government here, by declaring us out of his Protection and waging War against us.
He has plundered our seas, ravaged our Coasts, burnt our towns, and destroyed the lives of our people.
He is at this time transporting large armies of foreign mercenaries to compleat the works of death, desolation and tyranny, already begun with circumstances of Cruelty & perfidy scarcely paralleled in the most barbarous ages, and totally unworthy the Head of a civilized nation.
He has constrained our fellow Citizens taken Captive on the high Seas to bear Arms against their Country, to become the executioners of their friends and Brethren, or to fall themselves by their Hands.
He has excited domestic insurrections amongst us, and has endeavoured to bring on the inhabitants of our frontiers, the merciless Indian Savages, whose known rule of warfare, is an undistinguished destruction of all ages, sexes and conditions.
In every stage of these Oppressions We have Petitioned for Redress in the most humble terms: Our repeated Petitions have been answered only by repeated injury. A Prince, whose character is thus marked by every act which may define a Tyrant, is unfit to be the ruler of a free People.
Nor have We been wanting in attention to our British brethren. We have warned them from time to time of attempts by their legislature to extend an unwarrantable jurisdiction over us.
We have reminded them of the circumstances of our emigration and settlement here. We have appealed to their native justice and magnanimity, and we have conjured them by the ties of our common kindred to disavow these usurpations, which, would inevitably interrupt our connections and correspondence. They too have been deaf to the voice of justice and of consanguinity.
render: make
abdicated: given up
perfidy: violation of trust
insurrections: rebellions
petitioned for redress:
asked formally for a correction of wrongs
unwarrantable jurisdiction:
unjustified authority
consanguinity: originating from the same ancestor
The Declaration of Independence 189
Resolution of Independence The
final section declares that the colonies are "Free and Independent States" with the full power to make war, to form alliances, and to trade with other countries.
rectitude: rightness
We must, therefore, acquiesce in the necessity, which denounces our Separation, and hold them, as we hold the rest of mankind, Enemies in War, in Peace Friends.
[Resolution of Independence by the United States]
j	We, therefore, the Representatives of the united States of
j	America, in General Congress, Assembled, appealing to the
Supreme Judge of the world for the rectitude of our intentions, do, in the Name, and by Authority of the good People of these Colonies, solemnly publish and declare, That these United Colonies are, and of Right ought to be Free and Independent States; that they are Absolved from all Allegiance to the British Crown, and that all political connection between them and the State of Great Britain, is and ought to be totally dissolved; and that as Free and Independent States, they have full Power to levy War, conclude Peace, contract Alliances, establish Commerce, and to do all other Acts and Things which Independent States may of right do.
And for the support of this Declaration, with a firm reliance on the Protection of Divine Providence, we mutually pledge to each other our Lives, our Fortunes and our sacred Honor.
Signers of the Declaration The signers, as representatives of the American people, declared the colonies independent from Great Britain. Most members signed the document on August 2,1776.

John Hancock Presiden t fro m Massachusetts
Georgia
Button Gwinnett Lyman Hall George Walton
North Carolina
William Hooper Joseph Hewes John Penn
South Carolina
Edward Rutledge Thomas Heyward, Jr. Thomas Lynch, Jr. Arthur Middleton
Maryland
Samuel Chase William Paca Thomas Stone Charles Carroll
of Carrollton
Virginia
George Wythe Richard Henry Lee Thomas Jefferson Benjamin Harrison Thomas Nelson, Jr. Francis Lightfoot Lee Carter Braxton
Pennsylvania
Robert Morris Benjamin Rush Benjamin Franklin John Morton George Clymer James Smith George Taylor James Wilson George Ross
Delaware
Caesar Rodney George Read Thomas McKean
New York
William Floyd Philip Livingston Francis Lewis Lewis Morris
New Jersey
Richard Stockton John Witherspoon Francis Hopkinton John Hart Abraham Clark
New Hampshire
Josiah Bartlett William Whipple Matthew Thornton
Massachusetts
Samuel Adams John Adams Robert Treat Paine Elbridge Gerry
Rhode Island
Stephen Hopkins William Ellery
Connecticut
Samuel Huntington William Williams Oliver Wolcott Roger Sherman
190	The Declaration of Independence
The American Revolution
1776-1783
networks
There's More Online about the challenges facing Americans during the Revolutionary War era.	__
CHAPTER 7
Lesson 1
The War for Independence
Lesson 2
The War Continues
Lesson 3
Battlegrounds Shift
Lesson 4
The Final Years
The Story
Matters...
It is December 25,1776. General George Washington is preparing to lead 2,400 troops across the Delaware River to launch a surprise attack on the British troops stationed in Trenton. The river is filled with huge chunks of ice. The weather is terrible, and hurricane-force winds pound at Washington's troops. After crossing the Delaware River, General Washington and his troops will have to march 9 miles (14 km) to meet their enemy. The young United States is in desperate need of some battlefield success in its war against the British.
Go to the Foldables® library in the back of your book to make a Foldable® that will help you take notes while reading this chapter.
Foldables
. .The American Revolution
Q (Beginning (1776-1777) ,
Middle (1770-1779)
, Ending (1780-1783)
◄ General George Washington led the Continental Army in the War for Independence.
Samuel King/The Bridgeman Art Library/Getty Images
Samuel King/The Bridgeman Art Library/Getty Images
191
Assessment (continued)
In 1541, the Spanish priest Bartolome de Las Casas wrote:
PRIMARY SOURCE

“The pattern established at the outset has remained unchanged to this day, and the Spaniards still do nothing save tear the natives to shreds, murder them and inflict upon them untold misery, suffering and distress, tormenting... and persecuting them mercilessly."
A
Short Account of the Destruction of the Indies, by Bartolome de Las Casas © Analyzing What does this passage suggest about Spanish attitudes toward the Native Americans they encountered? 290
® Identifying Bias Why do you suppose the Spanish treated the Native Americans the way Las Casas describes? 29F
EXTENDED RESPONSE
(J) Persuasive Writing Imagine you are a friend of Christopher Columbus. He is frustrated by his failure to fund a voyage to find a water route around the world to Asia. Columbus asks you to write a letter to King Ferdinand and Queen Isabella of Spain. In the letter, explain why it is important for Columbus to make this voyage. 2a;29d;3od
STANDARDIZED TEST PRACTICE
DBQ
ANALYZING DOCUMENTS
© Identifying According to the map, where is St. Augustine located? 29c
A.
New Spain B.
New Granada C.
Peru D.
Rio de la Plata © Identifying Spanish settlements in North America include
F.
Lima. G.
LaPaz. H.
Santiago. I.
Santa Fe. Need Extra Help?
If You've Missed Question	©	©	©	©	©
Review Lesson	3	3	2	3	3
106 Exploring the Americas
Colonial America
1587-1770
networks
There's More Online about the people and events of early colonial America.
9SB
SENTIAL QUESTIONS
•How does geography influence the way people live? do boh ideas change the way people live? 

CHAPTER4!
Lesson 1
Roanoke and Jamestown
Lesson 2
The New England Colonies
Lesson 3
The Middle Colonies
Lesson 4
The Southern Colonies
The Story Matters.. •
She is born Matoaka, daughter of the chief of the Powhatan people. Yet she is such a fun-loving child that she is called "Pocahontas," or "playful one."
In 1607 bold Pocahontas—not yet a teenager—befriends some English colonists who settle nearby. She convinces her father to aid these colonists. With this help, the struggling colonists at Jamestown are able to survive.
SI
Goto the Foldables® library in the back of your book to make a Foldable® that will help you take notes while reading this chapter.
1585		Nevv' England
		Colonies
1589		Middle
		Colonies
1607		Southern Colonies
J
I
◄ Pocahontas played a key role in the early history of colonial Virginia.
W.
Langdon Kihn/National Geographic Society/Corbis 107
